Florida, session 2026, SB1366.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 111 112 Section 1.âSection 768.28, Florida Statutes, is amended to 113 read: 114 768.28âWaiver of sovereign immunity in tort actions; 115 recovery limits; civil liability for damages caused during a 116 riot; limitation on attorney fees; statute of limitations; 117 exclusions; indemnification; risk management programs.â 118 (1)âIn accordance with s. 13, Art. X of the State 119 Constitution, the state, for itself and for its agencies or 120 subdivisions, hereby waives sovereign immunity for liability for 121 torts, but only to the extent specified in this section act. 122 Actions at law against the state or any of its agencies or 123 subdivisions to recover damages in tort for money damages 124 against the state or its agencies or subdivisions for injury or 125 loss of property, personal injury, or death caused by the 126 negligent or wrongful act or omission of any employee of the 127 agency or subdivision while acting within the scope of the 128 employeeâs office or employment under circumstances in which the 129 state or such agency or subdivision, if a private person, would 130 be liable to the claimant, in accordance with the general laws 131 of this state, may be prosecuted subject to the limitations 132 specified in this section act. Any authorized such action may be 133 brought in the county where the property in litigation is 134 located or, if the affected agency or subdivision has an office 135 in the such county for the transaction of its customary 136 business, where the cause of action accrued. However, an any 137 such action against a state university board of trustees must 138 shall be brought in the county in which that universityâs main 139 campus is located or in the county in which the cause of action 140 accrued if the university maintains therein a substantial 141 presence for the transaction of its customary business in that 142 county. 143 (2)âAs used in this act, âstate agencies or subdivisionsâ 144 include the executive departments, the Legislature, the judicial 145 branch (including public defenders), and the independent 146 establishments of the state, including state university boards 147 of trustees; counties and municipalities; and corporations 148 primarily acting as instrumentalities or agencies of the state, 149 counties, or municipalities, including the Florida Space 150 Authority. 151 (3)âExcept for a municipality and the Florida Space 152 Authority, the affected agency or subdivision may, at its 153 discretion, request the assistance of the Department of 154 Financial Services in the consideration, adjustment, and 155 settlement of any claim under this section act. 156 (4)âSubject to the provisions of this section, any state 157 agency or subdivision may shall have the right to appeal any 158 award, compromise, settlement, or determination to the court of 159 appropriate jurisdiction. 160 (5)(a)âThe state and its agencies and subdivisions are 161 shall be liable for tort claims in the same manner and to the 162 same extent as a private individual under like circumstances, 163 but liability may shall not include punitive damages or interest 164 for the period before judgment. Neither The state and nor its 165 agencies or subdivisions are not shall be liable to pay a claim 166 or a judgment by any one person which exceeds the sum of 167 $300,000 $200,000 or any claim or judgment, or portions of a 168 claim or judgment thereof, which, when totaled with all other 169 claims or judgments paid by the state or its agencies or 170 subdivisions arising out of the same incident or occurrence, 171 exceeds the sum of $450,000 $300,000. However, a judgment or 172 judgments may be claimed and rendered in excess of these amounts 173 and may be settled and paid pursuant to this section act up to 174 $300,000 $200,000 or $450,000. Any $300,000, as the case may be; 175 and that portion of the judgment that exceeds these amounts may 176 be reported to the Legislature, but may be paid in part or in 177 whole only by further act of the Legislature. 178 (b)âNotwithstanding the limited waiver of sovereign 179 immunity in paragraph (a) provided herein, the state or an 180 agency or subdivision of the state thereof may agree, within the 181 limits of insurance coverage provided, to settle a claim made or 182 a judgment rendered against it without further action by the 183 Legislature, but the state or agency or subdivision of the state 184 may thereof shall not be deemed to have waived any defense of 185 sovereign immunity or to have increased the limits of its 186 liability as a result of its obtaining insurance coverage for 187 tortious acts in excess of the $300,000 $200,000 or $450,000 188 $300,000 waiver in paragraph (a) provided above. 189 (c)âThe limitations of liability set forth in this 190 subsection shall apply to the state and its agencies and 191 subdivisions whether or not the state or its agencies or 192 subdivisions possessed sovereign immunity before July 1, 1974. 193 (d)(b)âA municipality has a duty to allow the municipal law 194 enforcement agency to respond appropriately to protect persons 195 and property during a riot or an unlawful assembly based on the 196 availability of adequate equipment to its municipal law 197 enforcement officers and relevant state and federal laws. If the 198 governing body of a municipality or a person authorized by the 199 governing body of the municipality breaches that duty, the 200 municipality is civilly liable for any damages, including 201 damages arising from personal injury, wrongful death, or 202 property damages proximately caused by the municipalityâs breach 203 of duty. The sovereign immunity recovery limits in paragraph (a) 204 do not apply to an action under this paragraph. 205 (e)âWhen determining liability limits for a claim, the 206 limitations of liability in effect on the date the claim accrues 207 apply to the claim. 208 (f)âBeginning July 1, 2031, and on July 1 every 5 years 209 thereafter, the Department of Financial Services shall adjust 210 the limitations of liability in this subsection to reflect 211 changes in the Consumer Price Index for the South region or a 212 successor index as calculated by the United States Department of 213 Labor, not to exceed 3 percent for any such adjustment. 214 (6)(a)âAn action may not be instituted on a claim against 215 the state or one of its agencies or subdivisions unless the 216 claimant presents the claim in writing to the appropriate 217 agency, and also, except as to any claim against a municipality, 218 county, or the Florida Space Authority, presents the such claim 219 in writing to the Department of Financial Services, within 18 220 months 3 years after the such claim accrues and the Department 221 of Financial Services or the appropriate agency denies the claim 222 in writing; except that, if: 223 1.âThe Such claim is for contribution pursuant to s. 224 768.31, it must be so presented within 6 months after the 225 judgment against the tortfeasor seeking contribution has become 226 final by lapse of time for appeal or after appellate review or, 227 if there is no final such judgment, within 6 months after the 228 tortfeasor seeking contribution has either discharged the common 229 liability by payment or agreed, while the action is pending 230 against her or him, to discharge the common liability; or 231 2.âThe Such action arises from a violation of s. 794.011 232 involving a victim who was younger than 16 years of age at the 233 time of the act, the claimant may present the claim in writing 234 at any time. This subparagraph applies to any action other than 235 an action that would have been time barred on or before October 236 1, 2026 is for wrongful death, the claimant must present the 237 claim in writing to the Department of Financial Services within 238 2 years after the claim accrues. 239 (b)âFor purposes of this section, the requirements of 240 notice to the agency and denial of the claim pursuant to 241 paragraph (a) are conditions precedent to maintaining an action 242 but may shall not be deemed to be elements of the cause of 243 action and do shall not affect the date on which the cause of 244 action accrues. 245 (c)âThe claimant shall also provide to the agency the 246 claimantâs date and place of birth and social security number if 247 the claimant is an individual, or a federal identification 248 number if the claimant is not an individual. The claimant shall 249 also state the case style, tribunal, the nature and amount of 250 all adjudicated penalties, fines, fees, victim restitution fund, 251 and other judgments in excess of $200, whether imposed by a 252 civil, criminal, or administrative tribunal, owed by the 253 claimant to the state, its agency, officer or subdivision. If 254 there exists no prior adjudicated unpaid claim in excess of 255 $200, the claimant shall so state. 256 (d)âFor purposes of this section, complete, accurate, and 257 timely compliance with the requirements of paragraph (c) must 258 shall occur before prior to settlement payment, close of 259 discovery, or commencement of trial, whichever is earlier 260 sooner; provided the ability to plead setoff is not precluded by 261 the delay. This setoff applies shall apply only against that 262 part of the settlement or judgment payable to the claimant, 263 minus claimantâs reasonable attorney attorneyâs fees and costs. 264 Incomplete or inaccurate disclosure of unpaid adjudicated claims 265 due the state or, its agency, officer, or subdivision, may be 266 excused by the court upon a showing by the preponderance of the 267 evidence of the claimantâs lack of knowledge of an adjudicated 268 claim and reasonable inquiry by, or on behalf of, the claimant 269 to obtain the information from public records. Unless the 270 appropriate agency had actual notice of the information required 271 to be disclosed by paragraph (c) in time to assert a setoff, an 272 unexcused failure to disclose shall, upon hearing and order of 273 court, cause the claimant to be liable for double the original 274 undisclosed judgment and, upon further motion, the court shall 275 enter judgment for the agency in that amount. Except as provided 276 otherwise in this subsection, the failure of the Department of 277 Financial Services or the appropriate agency to make final 278 disposition of a claim within 4 months 6 months after it is 279 filed shall be deemed a final denial of the claim for purposes 280 of this section. For purposes of this subsection, in medical 281 malpractice actions and in wrongful death actions, the failure 282 of the Department of Financial Services or the appropriate 283 agency to make final disposition of a claim within 90 days after 284 it is filed shall be deemed a final denial of the claim. The 285 statute of limitations for medical malpractice actions and 286 wrongful death actions is tolled as to all prospective 287 defendants for the period of time taken by the Department of 288 Financial Services or the appropriate agency to deny the claim. 289 The provisions of This subsection does do not apply to such 290 claims that as may be asserted by counterclaim pursuant to s. 291 768.14. 292 (7)âIn actions brought pursuant to this section, process 293 must shall be served upon the head of the agency concerned and 294 also, except as to a defendant municipality, county, or the 295 Florida Space Authority, upon the Department of Financial 296 Services.; and The department or the agency served has concerned 297 shall have 30 days within which to file responsive pleadings 298 plead thereto. 299 (8)âAn No attorney may not charge, demand, receive, or 300 collect, for services rendered, fees in excess of 25 percent of 301 any funds recovered as a result of judgment or settlement. In 302 the enactment of a claim bill, as to payments made to the 303 claimant in excess of the limits in paragraph (5)(a), the 304 Legislature has the sole discretion to award an attorney fee 305 applicable to the excess which is less than 25 percent, 306 notwithstanding any agreement. The Legislature may also limit 307 payments for costs or otherwise reserve a portion of the 308 proceeds to the claimant. This subsection is deemed to be a part 309 of any fee agreement. 310 (9)(a)âAn officer, employee, or agent of the state or of 311 any of its subdivisions may not be held personally liable in 312 tort or named as a party defendant in any action for any injury 313 or damage suffered as a result of any act, event, or omission of 314 action in the scope of her or his employment or function, unless 315 the such officer, employee, or agent acted in bad faith or with 316 malicious purpose or in a manner exhibiting wanton and willful 317 disregard of human rights, safety, or property. However, the 318 such officer, employee, or agent shall be considered an adverse 319 witness in a tort action for any injury or damage suffered as a 320 result of any act, event, or omission of action in the scope of 321 her or his employment or function. The exclusive remedy for 322 injury or damage suffered as a result of an act, event, or 323 omission of an officer, employee, or agent of the state or any 324 of its subdivisions or constitutional officers is by action 325 against the governmental entity, or the head of such entity in 326 her or his official capacity, or the constitutional officer of 327 which the officer, employee, or agent is an employee, unless the 328 such act or omission was committed in bad faith or with 329 malicious purpose or in a manner exhibiting wanton and willful 330 disregard of human rights, safety, or property. The state or its 331 subdivisions are not liable in tort for the acts or omissions of 332 an officer, employee, or agent committed while acting outside 333 the course and scope of her or his employment or committed in 334 bad faith or with malicious purpose or in a manner exhibiting 335 wanton and willful disregard of human rights, safety, or 336 property. 337 (b)âAs used in this subsection, the term: 338 1.ââEmployeeâ includes any volunteer firefighter. 339 2.ââOfficer, employee, or agentâ includes, but is not 340 limited to, any health care provider when providing services 341 pursuant to s. 766.1115; any nonprofit independent college or 342 university located and chartered in this state which owns or 343 operates an accredited medical school, and its employees or 344 agents, when providing patient services pursuant to paragraph 345 (10)(f); any public defender or her or his employee or agent, 346 including an assistant public defender or an investigator; and 347 any member of a Child Protection Team, as defined in s. 39.01, 348 or any member of a threat management team, as described in s. 349 1006.07(7), when carrying out her or his duties as a team member 350 under the control, direction, and supervision of the state or 351 any of its agencies or subdivisions. 352 (c)âFor purposes of the waiver of sovereign immunity only, 353 a member of the Florida National Guard is not acting within the 354 scope of state employment when performing duty under the 355 provisions of Title 10 or Title 32 of the United States Code or 356 other applicable federal law; and neither the state or nor any 357 individual may not be named in any action under this chapter 358 arising from the performance of such federal duty. 359 (d)âThe employing agency of a law enforcement officer as 360 defined in s. 943.10 is not liable for injury, death, or 361 property damage effected or caused by a person fleeing from a 362 law enforcement officer in a motor vehicle if: 363 1.âThe pursuit is conducted in a manner that does not 364 involve conduct by the officer which is so reckless or wanting 365 in care as to constitute disregard of human life, human rights, 366 safety, or the property of another; 367 2.âAt the time the law enforcement officer initiates the 368 pursuit, the officer reasonably believes that the person fleeing 369 has committed a forcible felony as defined in s. 776.08; and 370 3.âThe pursuit is conducted by the officer pursuant to a 371 written policy governing high-speed pursuit adopted by the 372 employing agency. The policy must contain specific procedures 373 concerning the proper method to initiate and terminate high 374 speed pursuit. The law enforcement officer must have received 375 instructional training from the employing agency on the written 376 policy governing high-speed pursuit. 377 (10)(a)âHealth care providers or vendors, or any of their 378 employees or agents, that have contractually agreed to act as 379 agents of the Department of Corrections to provide health care 380 services to inmates of the state correctional system shall be 381 considered agents of the State of Florida, Department of 382 Corrections, for the purposes of this section, while acting 383 within the scope of and pursuant to guidelines established in 384 their contracts said contract or by rule. The contracts must 385 shall provide for the indemnification of the state by the agent 386 for any liabilities incurred up to the limits set out in this 387 chapter. 388 (b)âThis subsection may shall not be construed as 389 designating persons providing contracted health care services to 390 inmates as employees or agents of the state for the purposes of 391 chapter 440. 392 (c)âFor purposes of this section, regional poison control 393 centers created in accordance with s. 395.1027 and coordinated 394 and supervised under the Division of Childrenâs Medical Services 395 Prevention and Intervention of the Department of Health, or any 396 of their employees or agents, shall be considered agents of the 397 State of Florida, Department of Health. Any contracts with 398 poison control centers must provide, to the extent permitted by 399 law, for the indemnification of the state by the agency for any 400 liabilities incurred up to the limits set out in this chapter. 401 (d)âFor the purposes of this section, operators, 402 dispatchers, and providers of security for rail services and 403 rail facility maintenance providers in the South Florida Rail 404 Corridor, or any of their employees or agents, performing such 405 services under contract with and on behalf of the South Florida 406 Regional Transportation Authority or the Department of 407 Transportation shall be considered agents of the state while 408 acting within the scope of and pursuant to guidelines 409 established in their contracts said contract or by rule. 410 (e)âFor purposes of this section, a professional firm that 411 provides monitoring and inspection services of the work required 412 for state roadway, bridge, or other transportation facility 413 construction projects, or any employee of a firm performing 414 those such services, is considered an agent of the Department of 415 Transportation while acting within the scope of the firmâs 416 contract with the Department of Transportation to ensure that 417 the project is constructed in conformity with the projectâs 418 plans, specifications, and contract provisions. This paragraph 419 applies to a professional firm that is in direct contract with 420 the Department of Transportation, as well as any professional 421 firm providing monitoring and inspection services as a 422 consultant to the professional firm that is in direct contract 423 with the Department of Transportation. Any contract with a 424 professional firm must, to the extent permitted by law, provide 425 for the indemnification of the Department of Transportation for 426 any liability, including reasonable attorney fees, incurred up 427 to the limits set out in this chapter to the extent caused by 428 the negligence of the firm or its employees. This paragraph may 429 not be construed as designating persons who provide monitoring 430 and inspection services as employees or agents of the state for 431 purposes of chapter 440. This paragraph is not applicable to the 432 professional firm or its employees if involved in an accident 433 while operating a motor vehicle. This paragraph is not 434 applicable to a firm engaged by the Department of Transportation 435 for the design or construction of a state roadway, bridge, or 436 other transportation facility construction project or to its 437 employees, agents, or subcontractors. 438 (f)âFor purposes of this section, any nonprofit independent 439 college or university located and chartered in this state which 440 owns or operates an accredited medical school, or any of its 441 employees or agents, and which has agreed in an affiliation 442 agreement or other contract to provide, or permit its employees 443 or agents to provide, patient services as agents of a teaching 444 hospital, is considered an agent of the teaching hospital while 445 acting within the scope of and pursuant to guidelines 446 established in the affiliation agreement or other contract. To 447 the extent allowed by law, the contract must provide for the 448 indemnification of the teaching hospital, up to the limits set 449 out in this chapter, by the agent for any liability incurred 450 which was caused by the negligence of the college or university 451 or its employees or agents. The contract must also provide that 452 those limited portions of the college, university, or medical 453 school which are directly providing services pursuant to the 454 contract and which are considered an agent of the teaching 455 hospital for purposes of this section are deemed to be acting on 456 behalf of a public agency as defined in s. 119.011(2). 457 1.âFor purposes of this paragraph, the term: 458 a.ââEmployee or agentâ means an officer, employee, agent, 459 or servant of a nonprofit independent college or university 460 located and chartered in this state which owns or operates an 461 accredited medical school, including, but not limited to, the 462 faculty of the medical school, any health care practitioner or 463 licensee as defined in s. 456.001 for which the college or 464 university is vicariously liable, and the staff or 465 administrators of the medical school. 466 b.ââPatient servicesâ means: 467 (I)âComprehensive health care services as defined in s. 468 641.19, including any related administrative service, provided 469 to patients in a teaching hospital; 470 (II)âTraining and supervision of interns, residents, and 471 fellows providing patient services in a teaching hospital; or 472 (III)âTraining and supervision of medical students in a 473 teaching hospital. 474 c.ââTeaching hospitalâ means a teaching hospital as defined 475 in s. 408.07 which is owned or operated by the state, a county 476 or municipality, a public health trust, a special taxing 477 district, a governmental entity having health care 478 responsibilities, or a not-for-profit entity that operates such 479 facility as an agent of the state, or a political subdivision of 480 the state, under a lease or other contract. 481 2.âThe teaching hospital or the medical school, or its 482 employees or agents, must provide notice to each patient, or the 483 patientâs legal representative, that the college or university 484 that owns or operates the medical school and the employees or 485 agents of that college or university are acting as agents of the 486 teaching hospital and that the exclusive remedy for injury or 487 damage suffered as the result of any act or omission of the 488 teaching hospital, the college or university that owns or 489 operates the medical school, or the employees or agents of the 490 college or university, while acting within the scope of duties 491 pursuant to the affiliation agreement or other contract with a 492 teaching hospital, is by commencement of an action pursuant to 493 the provisions of this section. This notice requirement may be 494 met by posting the notice in a place conspicuous to all persons. 495 3.âThis paragraph does not designate any employee providing 496 contracted patient services in a teaching hospital as an 497 employee or agent of the state for purposes of chapter 440. 498 (g)âFor the purposes of this section, the executive 499 director of the Board of Nursing, when serving as the state 500 administrator of the Nurse Licensure Compact pursuant to s. 501 464.0095, and any administrator, officer, executive director, 502 employee, or representative of the Interstate Commission of 503 Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators, when acting within the 504 scope of their employment, duties, or responsibilities in this 505 state, are considered agents of the state. The commission shall 506 pay any claims or judgments pursuant to this section and may 507 maintain insurance coverage to pay any such claims or judgments. 508 (h)âFor purposes of this section, the individual appointed 509 under s. 491.004(8) as the stateâs delegate on the Counseling 510 Compact Commission, when serving in that capacity pursuant to s. 511 491.017, and any administrator, officer, executive director, 512 employee, or representative of the commission, when acting 513 within the scope of his or her employment, duties, or 514 responsibilities in this state, is considered an agent of the 515 state. The commission shall pay any claims or judgments pursuant 516 to this section and may maintain insurance coverage to pay those 517 any such claims or judgments. 518 (i)âFor purposes of this section, the individual appointed 519 under s. 490.004(7) as the stateâs commissioner on the 520 Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact Commission, when serving 521 in that capacity pursuant to s. 490.0075, and any administrator, 522 officer, executive director, employee, or representative of the 523 Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact Commission, when acting 524 within the scope of his or her employment, duties, or 525 responsibilities in this state, is considered an agent of the 526 state. The commission shall pay any claims or judgments pursuant 527 to this section and may maintain insurance coverage to pay those 528 any such claims or judgments. 529 (j)âFor purposes of this section, the representative 530 appointed from the Board of Medicine and the representative 531 appointed from the Board of Osteopathic Medicine, when serving 532 as commissioners of the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact 533 Commission pursuant to s. 456.4501, and any administrator, 534 officer, executive director, employee, or representative of the 535 Interstate Medical Licensure Compact Commission, when acting 536 within the scope of their employment, duties, or 537 responsibilities in this state, are considered agents of the 538 state. The commission shall pay any claims or judgments pursuant 539 to this section and may maintain insurance coverage to pay those 540 any such claims or judgments. 541 (k)âFor purposes of this section, the individuals appointed 542 under s. 468.1135(4) as the stateâs delegates on the Audiology 543 and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact Commission, 544 when serving in that capacity pursuant to s. 468.1335, and any 545 administrator, officer, executive director, employee, or 546 representative of the commission, when acting within the scope 547 of his or her employment, duties, or responsibilities in this 548 state, is considered an agent of the state. The commission shall 549 pay any claims or judgments pursuant to this section and may 550 maintain insurance coverage to pay those any such claims or 551 judgments. 552 (l)âFor purposes of this section, the individual appointed 553 under s. 486.023(5) as the stateâs delegate on the Physical 554 Therapy Compact Commission, when serving in that capacity 555 pursuant to s. 486.112, and any administrator, officer, 556 executive director, employee, or representative of the Physical 557 Therapy Compact Commission, when acting within the scope of his 558 or her employment, duties, or responsibilities in this state, is 559 considered an agent of the state. The commission shall pay any 560 claims or judgments pursuant to this section and may maintain 561 insurance coverage to pay those any such claims or judgments. 562 (11)(a)âProviders or vendors, or any of their employees or 563 agents, that have contractually agreed to act on behalf of the 564 state as agents of the Department of Juvenile Justice to provide 565 services to children in need of services, families in need of 566 services, or juvenile offenders are, solely with respect to such 567 services, agents of the state for purposes of this section while 568 acting within the scope of and pursuant to guidelines 569 established in the contract or by rule. A contract must provide 570 for the indemnification of the state by the agent for any 571 liabilities incurred up to the limits set out in this chapter. 572 (b)âThis subsection does not designate a person who 573 provides contracted services to juvenile offenders as an 574 employee or agent of the state for purposes of chapter 440. 575 (12)(a)âA health care practitioner, as defined in s. 576 456.001(4), who has contractually agreed to act as an agent of a 577 state university board of trustees to provide medical services 578 to a student athlete for participation in or as a result of 579 intercollegiate athletics, to include team practices, training, 580 and competitions, shall be considered an agent of the respective 581 state university board of trustees, for the purposes of this 582 section, while acting within the scope of and pursuant to 583 guidelines established in that contract. The contracts must 584 shall provide for the indemnification of the state by the agent 585 for any liabilities incurred up to the limits set out in this 586 chapter. 587 (b)âThis subsection may shall not be construed as 588 designating persons providing contracted health care services to 589 athletes as employees or agents of a state university board of 590 trustees for the purposes of chapter 440. 591 (13)âLaws allowing the state or its agencies or 592 subdivisions to buy insurance are still in force and effect and 593 are not restricted in any way by the terms of this section act. 594 (14)âA Every claim against the state or one of its agencies 595 or subdivisions for damages for a negligent or wrongful act or 596 omission pursuant to this section is shall be forever barred 597 unless the civil action is commenced by filing a complaint in 598 the court of appropriate jurisdiction: 599 (a)âWithin 2 years for an action founded on negligence. 600 (b)âWithin the limitations provided in s. 768.31(4) for an 601 action for contribution. 602 (c)âWithin the limitations provided in s. 95.11(5) for an 603 action for damages arising from medical malpractice or wrongful 604 death. 605 (d)âAt any time for an action arising from an act 606 constituting a violation of s. 794.011 involving a victim who 607 was under the age of 16 years at the time of the act. This 608 paragraph applies to any such action other than an action that 609 would have been time barred on or before October 1, 2026. 610 (e)âWithin 4 years for any other action not specified in 611 this subsection 4 years after the such claim accrues; except 612 that an action for contribution must be commenced within the 613 limitations provided in s. 768.31(4), and an action for damages 614 arising from medical malpractice or wrongful death must be 615 commenced within the limitations for such actions in s. 616 95.11(5). 617 (15)âAn No action may not be brought against the state or 618 any of its agencies or subdivisions by anyone who unlawfully 619 participates in a riot, unlawful assembly, public demonstration, 620 mob violence, or civil disobedience if the claim arises out of 621 the such riot, unlawful assembly, public demonstration, mob 622 violence, or civil disobedience. Nothing in This subsection does 623 not act shall abridge traditional immunities pertaining to 624 statements made in court. 625 (16)(a)âThe state and its agencies and subdivisions are 626 authorized to be self-insured, to enter into risk management 627 programs, or to purchase liability insurance for whatever 628 coverage they may choose, or to have any combination thereof, in 629 anticipation of any claim, judgment, and claims bill that which 630 they may be liable to pay pursuant to this section. Agencies or 631 subdivisions, and sheriffs, that are subject to homogeneous 632 risks may purchase insurance jointly or may join together as 633 self-insurers to provide other means of protection against tort 634 claims, any charter provisions or laws to the contrary 635 notwithstanding. 636 (b)âClaims files maintained by any risk management program 637 administered by the state, its agencies, and its subdivisions 638 are confidential and exempt from the provisions of s. 119.07(1) 639 and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution until termination 640 of all litigation and settlement of all claims arising out of 641 the same incident, although portions of the claims files may 642 remain exempt, as otherwise provided by law. Claims files 643 records may be released to other governmental agencies upon 644 written request and demonstration of need. Any; such records 645 held by the receiving agency remain confidential and exempt as 646 provided for in this paragraph. 647 (c)âPortions of meetings and proceedings conducted pursuant 648 to any risk management program administered by the state, its 649 agencies, or its subdivisions, which relate solely to the 650 evaluation of claims filed with the risk management program or 651 which relate solely to offers of compromise of claims filed with 652 the risk management program are exempt from the provisions of s. 653 286.011 and s. 24(b), Art. I of the State Constitution. Until 654 termination of all litigation and settlement of all claims 655 arising out of the same incident, persons privy to discussions 656 pertinent to the evaluation of a filed claim are shall not be 657 subject to subpoena in any administrative or civil proceeding 658 with regard to the content of those discussions. 659 (d)âMinutes of the meetings and proceedings of any risk 660 management program administered by the state, its agencies, or 661 its subdivisions, which relate solely to the evaluation of 662 claims filed with the risk management program or which relate 663 solely to offers of compromise of claims filed with the risk 664 management program are exempt from the provisions of s. 665 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution until 666 termination of all litigation and settlement of all claims 667 arising out of the same incident. 668 (17)âThis section, as amended by chapter 81-317, Laws of 669 Florida, shall apply only to causes of actions which accrue on 670 or after October 1, 1981. 671 (18)âA No provision of this section, or of any other 672 section of the Florida Statutes, whether read separately or in 673 conjunction with any other provision, may not shall be construed 674 to waive the immunity of the state or any of its agencies from 675 suit in federal court, as that such immunity is guaranteed by 676 the Eleventh Amendment to the Constitution of the United States, 677 unless the such waiver is explicitly and definitely stated to be 678 a waiver of the immunity of the state and its agencies from suit 679 in federal court. This subsection may shall not be construed to 680 mean that the state has at any time previously waived, by 681 implication, its immunity, or that of any of its agencies, from 682 suit in federal court through any statute in existence before 683 prior to June 24, 1984. 684 (18)(19)âNeither The state or an nor any agency or 685 subdivision of the state does not waive waives any defense of 686 sovereign immunity, or increase increases the limits of its 687 liability, upon entering into a contract contractual 688 relationship with another agency or subdivision of the state. 689 The Such a contract may must not contain any provision that 690 requires one party to indemnify or insure the other party for 691 the other partyâs negligence or to assume any liability for the 692 other partyâs negligence. This does not preclude a party from 693 requiring a nongovernmental entity to provide such 694 indemnification or insurance. The restrictions of this 695 subsection do not prohibit prevent a regional water supply 696 authority from indemnifying and assuming the liabilities of its 697 member governments for obligations arising from past acts or 698 omissions at or with property acquired from a member government 699 by the authority and arising from the acts or omissions of the 700 authority in performing activities contemplated by an interlocal 701 agreement. The Such indemnification may not be considered to 702 increase or otherwise waive the limits of liability to third 703 party claimants established by this section. 704 (19)(20)âEvery municipality, and any of its agencies agency 705 thereof, may is authorized to undertake to indemnify those 706 employees who that are exposed to personal liability pursuant to 707 the Clean Air Act Amendments of 1990, 42 U.S.C.A. ss. 7401 et 708 seq., and all rules and regulations adopted to implement that 709 act, for acts performed within the course and scope of their 710 employment with the municipality or its agency, including, but 711 not limited to, indemnification pertaining to the holding, 712 transfer, or disposition of allowances allocated to the 713 municipalityâs or its agencyâs electric generating units, and 714 the monitoring, submission, certification, and compliance with 715 permits, permit applications, records, compliance plans, and 716 reports for those units, when those such acts are performed 717 within the course and scope of their employment with the 718 municipality or its agency. The authority to indemnify under 719 this section covers every act by an employee which is when such 720 act is performed within the course and scope of her or his 721 employment with the municipality or its agency, but does not 722 cover any act of willful misconduct or any intentional or 723 knowing violation of any law by the employee. The authority to 724 indemnify under this section includes, but is not limited to, 725 the authority to pay any fine and provide legal representation 726 in any action. 727 Section 2.âThis act applies to causes of action that accrue 728 on or after October 1, 2026. 729 Section 3.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 730 29.0081, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 731 29.0081âCounty funding of additional court personnel.â 732 (2)âThe agreement shall, at a minimum, provide that: 733 (b)âThe personnel whose employment is funded under the 734 agreement are hired, supervised, managed, and fired by personnel 735 of the judicial circuit. The county shall be considered the 736 employer for purposes of s. 440.10 and chapter 443. Employees 737 funded by the county under this section and other county 738 employees may be aggregated for purposes of a flexible benefits 739 plan pursuant to s. 125 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 740 The judicial circuit shall supervise the personnel whose 741 employment is funded under the agreement; be responsible for 742 compliance with all requirements of federal and state employment 743 laws, including, but not limited to, Title VII of the Civil 744 Rights Act of 1964, Title I of the Americans with Disabilities 745 Act, 42 U.S.C. s. 1983, the Family Medical Leave Act, the Fair 746 Labor Standards Act, chapters 447 and 760, and ss. 112.3187, 747 440.105, and 440.205; and fully indemnify the county from any 748 liability under such laws, as authorized by s. 768.28(18) s. 749 768.28(19), to the extent such liability is the result of the 750 acts or omissions of the judicial circuit or its agents or 751 employees. 752 Section 4.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 753 39.8297, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 754 39.8297âCounty funding for guardian ad litem employees.â 755 (2)âThe agreement, at a minimum, must provide that: 756 (b)âThe persons who are employed will be hired, supervised, 757 managed, and terminated by the executive director of the 758 Statewide Guardian ad Litem Office. The statewide office is 759 responsible for compliance with all requirements of federal and 760 state employment laws, and shall fully indemnify the county from 761 any liability under such laws, as authorized by s. 768.28(18) s. 762 768.28(19), to the extent such liability is the result of the 763 acts or omissions of the Statewide Guardian ad Litem Office or 764 its agents or employees. 765 Section 5.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 766 343.811, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 767 343.811âPower to assume indemnification and insurance 768 obligations.â 769 (3)âASSUMPTION OF OBLIGATIONS; PURCHASE OF INSURANCE.âIn 770 conjunction with the development or operation of a commuter rail 771 service on the Coastal Link corridor, an agency may: 772 (a)âAssume obligations pursuant to the following: 773 1.a.âThe agency may assume the obligation by contract to 774 protect, defend, indemnify, and hold harmless FECR and its 775 officers, agents, and employees from and against: 776 (I)âAny liability, cost, and expense, including, but not 777 limited to, the agencyâs passengers and other rail corridor 778 invitees in, on, or about the Coastal Link corridor, regardless 779 of whether the loss, damage, destruction, injury, or death 780 giving rise to any such liability, cost, or expense is caused in 781 whole or in part, and to whatever nature or degree, by the 782 fault, failure, negligence, misconduct, nonfeasance, or 783 misfeasance of such freight rail operator, its successors, or 784 its officers, agents, and employees, or any other person or 785 persons whomsoever. 786 (II)âAny loss, injury, or damage incurred by other rail 787 corridor invitees up to the amount of the self-insurance 788 retention amount with respect to limited covered accidents 789 caused by the agency. 790 b.âThe agency may assume the obligation by contract to 791 protect, defend, indemnify, and hold harmless Brightline and its 792 officers, agents, and employees from and against: 793 (I)âAny liability, cost, and expense, including, but not 794 limited to, the agencyâs passengers and rail corridor invitees 795 in the Coastal Link corridor, regardless of whether the loss, 796 damage, destruction, injury, or death giving rise to any such 797 liability, cost, or expense is caused in whole or in part, and 798 to whatever nature or degree, by the fault, failure, negligence, 799 misconduct, nonfeasance, or misfeasance of Brightline, its 800 successors, or its officers, agents, and employees, or any other 801 person or persons whomsoever. 802 (II)âAny loss, injury, or damage incurred by other rail 803 corridor invitees up to the amount of the self-insurance 804 retention amount with respect to limited covered accidents 805 caused by the agency. 806 2.âThe assumption of liability of the agency by contract 807 pursuant to sub-subparagraph 1.a. or sub-subparagraph 1.b. may 808 not in any instance exceed the following parameters of 809 allocation of risk: 810 a.âThe agency may be solely responsible for any loss, 811 injury, or damage to the agencyâs passengers, or rail corridor 812 invitees, third parties, or trespassers, regardless of 813 circumstances or cause, subject to sub-subparagraph b. and 814 subparagraphs 3., 4., and 5. 815 b.(I)âIn the event of a limited covered accident caused by 816 FECR, the authority of an agency to protect, defend, and 817 indemnify FECR for all liability, cost, and expense, including 818 punitive or exemplary damages, in excess of the self-insurance 819 retention amount exists only if FECR agrees, with respect to 820 such limited covered accident caused by FECR, to protect, 821 defend, and indemnify the agency for the amount of the self 822 insurance retention amount. 823 (II)âIn the event of a limited covered accident caused by 824 Brightline, the authority of an agency to protect, defend, and 825 indemnify Brightline for all liability, cost, and expense, 826 including punitive or exemplary damages, in excess of the self 827 insurance retention amount exists only if Brightline agrees, 828 with respect to such limited covered accident, to protect, 829 defend, and indemnify the agency for the amount of the self 830 insurance retention amount. 831 3.âWhen only one train is involved in an incident and: 832 a.âThe train is an agencyâs train, including an incident 833 with trespassers or at-grade crossings, the agency may be solely 834 responsible for any loss, injury, or damage. 835 b.âThe train is FECRâs train, including an incident with 836 trespassers or at-grade crossings, FECR is solely responsible 837 for any loss, injury, or damage, except for the agencyâs 838 passengers and other rail corridor invitees, which are the 839 responsibility of the agency, and Brightlineâs passengers and 840 other rail corridor invitees, which are the responsibility of 841 Brightline. 842 c.âThe train is Brightlineâs train, including an incident 843 with trespassers or at-grade crossings, Brightline is solely 844 responsible for any loss, injury, or damage, except for the 845 agencyâs passengers or rail corridor invitees, which are the 846 responsibility of the agency, and FECRâs rail corridor invitees, 847 which are the responsibility of FECR. 848 4.âWhen an incident involves more than one operator, each 849 operator is responsible for: 850 a.âIts property; passengers; employees, excluding employees 851 who are, at the time of the incident, rail corridor invitees of 852 another operator; and other rail corridor invitees. 853 b.âIts proportionate share of any loss or damage to the 854 joint infrastructure. 855 c.âIts proportionate share of any loss, injury, or damage 856 to: 857 (I)âRail corridor invitees who are not rail corridor 858 invitees of operators, provided that the agency shall always be 859 responsible for its passengers and its rail corridor invitees 860 regardless of whether the agency was involved in the incident. 861 (II)âTrespassers or third parties outside the Coastal Link 862 corridor as a result of the incident. 863 5.âAny such contractual duty to protect, defend, indemnify, 864 and hold harmless FECR or Brightline with respect to claims by 865 rail passengers shall expressly include a specific cap on the 866 amount of the contractual duty, which amount may not exceed $323 867 million per occurrence and shall be adjusted so that the per 868 occurrence insurance requirement is equal to the aggregate 869 allowable awards to all rail passengers, against all defendants, 870 for all claims, including claims for punitive damages, arising 871 from a single accident or incident in accordance with 49 U.S.C. 872 s. 28103, or any successor provision, without prior legislative 873 approval. 874 6.âNotwithstanding any provision of this section to the 875 contrary, the liabilities of the agency to the state or any 876 other agency shall be as set forth in an agreement among such 877 entities and limited by s. 768.28(18) s. 768.28(19). 878 879 Neither the assumption by contract to protect, defend, 880 indemnify, and hold harmless; the purchase of insurance; nor the 881 establishment of a self-insurance retention fund shall be deemed 882 to be a waiver of any defense of sovereign immunity for tort 883 claims or deemed to increase the limits of the agencyâs 884 liability for tort claims as provided in s. 768.28. 885 Section 6.âSubsection (2) of section 944.713, Florida 886 Statutes, is amended to read: 887 944.713âInsurance against liability.â 888 (2)âThe contract shall provide for indemnification of the 889 state by the private vendor for any liabilities incurred up to 890 the limits provided under s. 768.28(5). The contract shall 891 provide that the private vendor, or the insurer of the private 892 vendor, is liable to pay any claim or judgment for any one 893 person which does not exceed the applicable maximum amount 894 provided in s. 768.28(5) sum of $100,000 or any claim or 895 judgment, or portions thereof, which, when totaled with all 896 other claims or judgments arising out of the same incident or 897 occurrence, does not exceed the sum of $200,000. In addition, 898 the contractor must agree to defend, hold harmless, and 899 indemnify the department against any and all actions, claims, 900 damages and losses, including costs and attorneyâs fees. 901 Section 7.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 902 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 903 reference thereto, subsection (5) of section 45.061, Florida 904 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 905 45.061âOffers of settlement.â 906 (5)âSanctions authorized under this section may be imposed 907 notwithstanding any limitation on recovery of costs or expenses 908 which may be provided by contract or in other provisions of 909 Florida law. This section shall not be construed to waive the 910 limits of sovereign immunity set forth in s. 768.28. 911 Section 8.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 912 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 913 reference thereto, paragraph (f) of subsection (6) of section 914 95.11, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 915 95.11âLimitations other than for the recovery of real 916 property.âActions other than for recovery of real property shall 917 be commenced as follows: 918 (6)âWITHIN ONE YEAR.â 919 (f)âExcept for actions described in subsection (9), or a 920 petition challenging a criminal conviction, all petitions; 921 extraordinary writs; tort actions, including those under s. 922 768.28(14); or other actions which concern any condition of 923 confinement of a prisoner filed by or on behalf of a prisoner as 924 defined in s. 57.085. Any petition, writ, or action brought 925 under this paragraph must be commenced within 1 year after the 926 time the incident, conduct, or conditions occurred or within 1 927 year after the time the incident, conduct, or conditions were 928 discovered, or should have been discovered. 929 Section 9.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 930 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 931 reference thereto, subsection (4) of section 110.504, Florida 932 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 933 110.504âVolunteer benefits.â 934 (4)âVolunteers shall be covered by state liability 935 protection in accordance with the definition of a volunteer and 936 the provisions of s. 768.28. 937 Section 10.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 938 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 939 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 940 111.071, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 941 111.071âPayment of judgments or settlements against certain 942 public officers or employees.â 943 (1)âAny county, municipality, political subdivision, or 944 agency of the state which has been excluded from participation 945 in the Insurance Risk Management Trust Fund is authorized to 946 expend available funds to pay: 947 (a)âAny final judgment, including damages, costs, and 948 attorneyâs fees, arising from a complaint for damages or injury 949 suffered as a result of any act or omission of action of any 950 officer, employee, or agent in a civil or civil rights lawsuit 951 described in s. 111.07. If the civil action arises under s. 952 768.28 as a tort claim, the limitations and provisions of s. 953 768.28 governing payment shall apply. If the action is a civil 954 rights action arising under 42 U.S.C. s. 1983, or similar 955 federal statutes, payments for the full amount of the judgment 956 may be made unless the officer, employee, or agent has been 957 determined in the final judgment to have caused the harm 958 intentionally. 959 Section 11.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 960 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 961 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 962 125.01015, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 963 125.01015âOffice of the sheriff.â 964 (2)âTo ensure the successful transfer of the exclusive 965 policing responsibility and authority to the sheriff in a 966 county, as defined in s. 125.011(1), the board of county 967 commissioners shall: 968 (b)âAfter the election of the sheriff is certified: 969 1.âProvide funding for all of the necessary staff and 970 office space for the sheriff-elect to establish an independent 971 office of the sheriff, so that the office may effectively 972 operate and perform all of the functions required by general law 973 when the sheriff-elect takes office. 974 2.âProvide funding for the sheriff-elect to select any 975 necessary insurances not provided by the county through the 976 interlocal agreement required under sub-subparagraph 6.d. to 977 allow the sheriff to effectively operate and perform all of the 978 functions required by general law when he or she takes office. 979 3.âProvide funding for the sheriff-elect to establish bank 980 and other accounts, as necessary, in his or her official 981 capacity as sheriff, so that such accounts become operational 982 when he or she takes office. 983 4.âUnless otherwise transferable based on existing surety 984 bonds for the sheriffâs deputies, provide funding for and 985 facilitate procurement of the required surety bonds for deputy 986 sheriffs pursuant to s. 30.09, so that such bonds are in place 987 when the sheriff-elect takes office. 988 5.âPrepare and deliver to the office of the sheriff all 989 documents, property, and other items listed in subsection (4). 990 6.âNotwithstanding any provision to the contrary, for a 991 term commencing on January 7, 2025, and ending on or after 992 September 30, 2028, provide the sheriff-elect taking office 993 with, and require the sheriff-elect taking office to use, not 994 less than the substantially and materially same support 995 services, facilities, office space, and information technology 996 infrastructure provided to county offices or departments 997 performing the duties to be performed by the sheriff-elect upon 998 taking office in the 1-year period before he or she takes 999 office. 1000 a.âAs used in this subparagraph, the term âsupport 1001 servicesâ includes: 1002 (I)âProperty and facilities, and the management and 1003 maintenance for such property and facilities. 1004 (II)âCommunications infrastructure, including telephone and 1005 Internet connectivity. 1006 (III)âRisk management, including processing, adjusting, and 1007 payment of all claims and demands, including those made under s. 1008 768.28. The county shall provide the sheriff with all required 1009 general liability, property, and other insurance coverage 1010 through its self-insurance program, a self-insurance risk pool, 1011 or commercial insurance. If the county provides insurance 1012 through a self-insurance program, the county must also provide 1013 the sheriff with commercial stop-loss coverage in an amount and 1014 with a self-insured retention agreed upon by the sheriff and the 1015 county. 1016 (IV)âLegal representation and advice through the office of 1017 the county attorney for all claims, demands, and causes of 1018 action brought against the sheriff, his or her deputies, or 1019 other personnel in their official and individual capacities, 1020 while acting in their official and individual capacities, 1021 including any required outside counsel due to conflicts of 1022 interest. This sub-sub-subparagraph does not prohibit the 1023 sheriff from employing or retaining his or her own legal 1024 representation as he or she deems necessary. 1025 (V)âPurchasing and procurement services using procedures 1026 under the laws and ordinances applicable to the county for 1027 purchases requiring competitive procurement. 1028 (VI)âBudget and fiscal software and budget development 1029 services. 1030 (VII)âHuman resource services, including, but not limited 1031 to, facilitation of the hiring process, including employee 1032 applicant screening and employee applicant background checks, 1033 and employee benefit administration. The county may provide 1034 human resource services to the sheriff. However, the sheriff is 1035 the employer of his or her employees, and the sheriff retains 1036 full and complete control and authority over the hiring of his 1037 or her employees and the terms and conditions of employment, 1038 including employee discipline and termination of employment. The 1039 provision of human resource services by the county to the 1040 sheriff does not create a joint-employer relationship. The 1041 sheriffâs employees shall remain members of the countyâs health 1042 insurance and workersâ compensation plans for at least the term 1043 set forth in this subparagraph. 1044 (VIII)âFleet management, including procurement of all 1045 vehicles and other mobile assets such as boats and aircraft, and 1046 all vehicle repair and maintenance. 1047 b.âAs used in this subparagraph, the term âinformation 1048 technology infrastructureâ includes: 1049 (I)âAll hardware, including computers. 1050 (II)âBudget and fiscal software, including payroll and 1051 purchasing software. 1052 (III)âComputer-aided dispatch. 1053 c.âUnder a cost allocation plan agreed to by the county and 1054 the sheriff, the sheriff shall pay the county for such support 1055 services and information technology infrastructure from his or 1056 her general fund budget, except for any support services and 1057 information technology infrastructure costs that general law 1058 otherwise and expressly requires the county to fund outside the 1059 sheriffâs budget. 1060 d.âTo satisfy compliance with this subsection and to 1061 establish the office of the sheriff in a manner that minimizes 1062 unnecessary financial expenditures, the county and the sheriff 1063 shall execute an interlocal agreement addressing the 1064 requirements of this subsection and other expenditures, 1065 including an appropriate phase-in period for identification of 1066 the sheriffâs assets with the sheriffâs markings to minimize the 1067 cost to taxpayers. The interlocal agreement shall have a term 1068 that ends no earlier than September 30, 2028, and may be 1069 amended, renewed, extended, or newly adopted at any time 1070 following the expiration or termination of the agreement. After 1071 the initial period ending no earlier than September 30, 2028, an 1072 interlocal agreement may be entered into between the county and 1073 the sheriff which provides for the same or different 1074 requirements as set forth in this subsection. 1075 Section 12.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1076 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in 1077 references thereto, paragraph (h) of subsection (3) and 1078 paragraph (k) of subsection (15) of section 163.01, Florida 1079 Statutes, are reenacted to read: 1080 163.01âFlorida Interlocal Cooperation Act of 1969.â 1081 (3)âAs used in this section: 1082 (h)ââLocal government liability poolâ means a reciprocal 1083 insurer as defined in s. 629.011 or any self-insurance program 1084 created pursuant to s. 768.28(16), formed and controlled by 1085 counties or municipalities of this state to provide liability 1086 insurance coverage for counties, municipalities, or other public 1087 agencies of this state, which pool may contract with other 1088 parties for the purpose of providing claims administration, 1089 processing, accounting, and other administrative facilities. 1090 (15)âNotwithstanding any other provision of this section or 1091 of any other law except s. 361.14, any public agency of this 1092 state which is an electric utility, or any separate legal entity 1093 created pursuant to the provisions of this section, the 1094 membership of which consists only of electric utilities, and 1095 which exercises or proposes to exercise the powers granted by 1096 part II of chapter 361, the Joint Power Act, may exercise any or 1097 all of the following powers: 1098 (k)âThe limitations on waiver in the provisions of s. 1099 768.28 or any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, the 1100 Legislature, in accordance with s. 13, Art. X of the State 1101 Constitution, hereby declares that any such legal entity or any 1102 public agency of this state that participates in any electric 1103 project waives its sovereign immunity to: 1104 1.âAll other persons participating therein; and 1105 2.âAny person in any manner contracting with a legal entity 1106 of which any such public agency is a member, with relation to: 1107 a.âOwnership, operation, or any other activity set forth in 1108 sub-subparagraph (b)2.d. with relation to any electric project; 1109 or 1110 b.âThe supplying or purchasing of services, output, 1111 capacity, energy, or any combination thereof. 1112 Section 13.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1113 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 1114 reference thereto, section 190.043, Florida Statutes, is 1115 reenacted to read: 1116 190.043âSuits against the district.âAny suit or action 1117 brought or maintained against the district for damages arising 1118 out of tort, including, without limitation, any claim arising 1119 upon account of an act causing an injury or loss of property, 1120 personal injury, or death, shall be subject to the limitations 1121 provided in s. 768.28. 1122 Section 14.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1123 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 1124 reference thereto, subsection (13) of section 213.015, Florida 1125 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1126 213.015âTaxpayer rights.âThere is created a Florida 1127 Taxpayerâs Bill of Rights to guarantee that the rights, privacy, 1128 and property of Florida taxpayers are adequately safeguarded and 1129 protected during tax assessment, collection, and enforcement 1130 processes administered under the revenue laws of this state. The 1131 Taxpayerâs Bill of Rights compiles, in one document, brief but 1132 comprehensive statements which explain, in simple, nontechnical 1133 terms, the rights and obligations of the Department of Revenue 1134 and taxpayers. Section 192.0105 provides additional rights 1135 afforded to payors of property taxes and assessments. The rights 1136 afforded taxpayers to ensure that their privacy and property are 1137 safeguarded and protected during tax assessment and collection 1138 are available only insofar as they are implemented in other 1139 parts of the Florida Statutes or rules of the Department of 1140 Revenue. The rights so guaranteed Florida taxpayers in the 1141 Florida Statutes and the departmental rules are: 1142 (13)âThe right to an action at law within the limitations 1143 of s. 768.28, relating to sovereign immunity, to recover damages 1144 against the state or the Department of Revenue for injury caused 1145 by the wrongful or negligent act or omission of a department 1146 officer or employee (see s. 768.28). 1147 Section 15.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1148 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 1149 reference thereto, section 252.51, Florida Statutes, is 1150 reenacted to read: 1151 252.51âLiability.âAny person or organization, public or 1152 private, owning or controlling real estate or other premises who 1153 voluntarily and without compensation, other than payment or 1154 reimbursement of costs and expenses, grants a license or 1155 privilege or otherwise permits the designation by the local 1156 emergency management agency or use of the whole or any part of 1157 such real estate or premises for the purpose of sheltering 1158 persons during an actual, impending, mock, or practice 1159 emergency, together with her or his successor in interest, if 1160 any, shall not be liable for the death of, or injury to, any 1161 person on or about such real estate or premises during the 1162 actual, impending, mock, or practice emergency, or for loss of, 1163 or damage to, the property of such person, solely by reason or 1164 as a result of such license, privilege, designation, or use, 1165 unless the gross negligence or the willful and wanton misconduct 1166 of such person owning or controlling such real estate or 1167 premises or her or his successor in interest is the proximate 1168 cause of such death, injury, loss, or damage occurring during 1169 such sheltering period. Any such person or organization who 1170 provides such shelter space for compensation shall be deemed to 1171 be an instrumentality of the state or its applicable agency or 1172 subdivision for the purposes of s. 768.28. 1173 Section 16.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1174 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 1175 reference thereto, section 252.89, Florida Statutes, is 1176 reenacted to read: 1177 252.89âTort liability.âThe commission and the committees 1178 shall be state agencies, and the members of the commission and 1179 committees shall be officers, employees, or agents of the state 1180 for the purposes of s. 768.28. 1181 Section 17.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1182 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 1183 reference thereto, section 252.944, Florida Statutes, is 1184 reenacted to read: 1185 252.944âTort liability.âThe commission and the committees 1186 are state agencies, and the members of the commission and 1187 committees are officers, employees, or agents of the state for 1188 the purpose of s. 768.28. 1189 Section 18.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1190 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 1191 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 260.0125, Florida 1192 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1193 260.0125âLimitation on liability of private landowners 1194 whose property is designated as part of the statewide system of 1195 greenways and trails.â 1196 (2)âAny private landowner who consents to designation of 1197 his or her land as part of the statewide system of greenways and 1198 trails pursuant to s. 260.016(2)(d) without compensation shall 1199 be considered a volunteer, as defined in s. 110.501, and shall 1200 be covered by state liability protection pursuant to s. 768.28, 1201 including s. 768.28(9). 1202 Section 19.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1203 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 1204 reference thereto, section 284.31, Florida Statutes, is 1205 reenacted to read: 1206 284.31âScope and types of coverages; separate accounts.âThe 1207 Insurance Risk Management Trust Fund must, unless specifically 1208 excluded by the Department of Financial Services, cover all 1209 departments of the State of Florida and their employees, agents, 1210 and volunteers and must provide separate accounts for workersâ 1211 compensation, general liability, fleet automotive liability, 1212 federal civil rights actions under 42 U.S.C. s. 1983 or similar 1213 federal statutes, state agency firefighter cancer benefits 1214 payable under s. 112.1816(2), and court-awarded attorney fees in 1215 other proceedings against the state except for such awards in 1216 eminent domain or for inverse condemnation or for awards by the 1217 Public Employees Relations Commission. Unless specifically 1218 excluded by the Department of Financial Services, the Insurance 1219 Risk Management Trust Fund must provide fleet automotive 1220 liability coverage to motor vehicles titled to the state, or to 1221 any department of the state, when such motor vehicles are used 1222 by community transportation coordinators performing, under 1223 contract to the appropriate department of the state, services 1224 for the transportation disadvantaged under part I of chapter 1225 427. Such fleet automotive liability coverage is primary and is 1226 subject to s. 768.28 and parts II and III of chapter 284, and 1227 applicable rules adopted thereunder, and the terms and 1228 conditions of the certificate of coverage issued by the 1229 Department of Financial Services. 1230 Section 20.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1231 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in 1232 references thereto, section 284.38, Florida Statutes, is 1233 reenacted to read: 1234 284.38âWaiver of sovereign immunity; effect.âThe insurance 1235 programs developed herein shall provide limits as established by 1236 the provisions of s. 768.28 if a tort claim. The limits provided 1237 in s. 768.28 shall not apply to a civil rights action arising 1238 under 42 U.S.C. s. 1983 or similar federal statute. Payment of a 1239 pending or future claim or judgment arising under any of said 1240 statutes may be made upon this act becoming a law, unless the 1241 officer, employee, or agent has been determined in the final 1242 judgment to have caused the harm intentionally; however, the 1243 fund is authorized to pay all other court-ordered attorneyâs 1244 fees as provided under s. 284.31. 1245 Section 21.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1246 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 1247 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 1248 322.13, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1249 322.13âDriver license examiners.â 1250 (1) 1251 (b)âThose persons serving as driver license examiners are 1252 not liable for actions taken within the scope of their 1253 employment or designation, except as provided by s. 768.28. 1254 Section 22.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1255 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 1256 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 337.19, Florida 1257 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1258 337.19âSuits by and against department; limitation of 1259 actions; forum.â 1260 (1)âSuits at law and in equity may be brought and 1261 maintained by and against the department on any contract claim 1262 arising from breach of an express provision or an implied 1263 covenant of a written agreement or a written directive issued by 1264 the department pursuant to the written agreement. In any such 1265 suit, the department and the contractor shall have all of the 1266 same rights and obligations as a private person under a like 1267 contract except that no liability may be based on an oral 1268 modification of either the written contract or written 1269 directive. Nothing herein shall be construed to waive the 1270 sovereign immunity of the state and its political subdivisions 1271 from equitable claims and equitable remedies. Notwithstanding 1272 anything to the contrary contained in this section, no employee 1273 or agent of the department may be held personally liable to an 1274 extent greater than that pursuant to s. 768.28 provided that no 1275 suit sounding in tort shall be maintained against the 1276 department. 1277 Section 23.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1278 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 1279 reference thereto, subsection (17) of section 341.302, Florida 1280 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1281 341.302âRail program; duties and responsibilities of the 1282 department.âThe department, in conjunction with other 1283 governmental entities, including the rail enterprise and the 1284 private sector, shall develop and implement a rail program of 1285 statewide application designed to ensure the proper maintenance, 1286 safety, revitalization, and expansion of the rail system to 1287 assure its continued and increased availability to respond to 1288 statewide mobility needs. Within the resources provided pursuant 1289 to chapter 216, and as authorized under federal law, the 1290 department shall: 1291 (17)âIn conjunction with the acquisition, ownership, 1292 construction, operation, maintenance, and management of a rail 1293 corridor, have the authority to: 1294 (a)âAssume obligations pursuant to the following: 1295 1.a.âThe department may assume the obligation by contract 1296 to forever protect, defend, indemnify, and hold harmless the 1297 freight rail operator, or its successors, from whom the 1298 department has acquired a real property interest in the rail 1299 corridor, and that freight rail operatorâs officers, agents, and 1300 employees, from and against any liability, cost, and expense, 1301 including, but not limited to, commuter rail passengers and rail 1302 corridor invitees in the rail corridor, regardless of whether 1303 the loss, damage, destruction, injury, or death giving rise to 1304 any such liability, cost, or expense is caused in whole or in 1305 part, and to whatever nature or degree, by the fault, failure, 1306 negligence, misconduct, nonfeasance, or misfeasance of such 1307 freight rail operator, its successors, or its officers, agents, 1308 and employees, or any other person or persons whomsoever; or 1309 b.âThe department may assume the obligation by contract to 1310 forever protect, defend, indemnify, and hold harmless National 1311 Railroad Passenger Corporation, or its successors, and officers, 1312 agents, and employees of National Railroad Passenger 1313 Corporation, from and against any liability, cost, and expense, 1314 including, but not limited to, commuter rail passengers and rail 1315 corridor invitees in the rail corridor, regardless of whether 1316 the loss, damage, destruction, injury, or death giving rise to 1317 any such liability, cost, or expense is caused in whole or in 1318 part, and to whatever nature or degree, by the fault, failure, 1319 negligence, misconduct, nonfeasance, or misfeasance of National 1320 Railroad Passenger Corporation, its successors, or its officers, 1321 agents, and employees, or any other person or persons 1322 whomsoever. 1323 2.âThe assumption of liability of the department by 1324 contract pursuant to sub-subparagraph 1.a. or sub-subparagraph 1325 1.b. may not in any instance exceed the following parameters of 1326 allocation of risk: 1327 a.âThe department may be solely responsible for any loss, 1328 injury, or damage to commuter rail passengers, or rail corridor 1329 invitees, or trespassers, regardless of circumstances or cause, 1330 subject to sub-subparagraph b. and subparagraphs 3., 4., 5., and 1331 6. 1332 b.(I)âIn the event of a limited covered accident, the 1333 authority of the department to protect, defend, and indemnify 1334 the freight operator for all liability, cost, and expense, 1335 including punitive or exemplary damages, in excess of the 1336 deductible or self-insurance retention fund established under 1337 paragraph (b) and actually in force at the time of the limited 1338 covered accident exists only if the freight operator agrees, 1339 with respect to the limited covered accident, to protect, 1340 defend, and indemnify the department for the amount of the 1341 deductible or self-insurance retention fund established under 1342 paragraph (b) and actually in force at the time of the limited 1343 covered accident. 1344 (II)âIn the event of a limited covered accident, the 1345 authority of the department to protect, defend, and indemnify 1346 National Railroad Passenger Corporation for all liability, cost, 1347 and expense, including punitive or exemplary damages, in excess 1348 of the deductible or self-insurance retention fund established 1349 under paragraph (b) and actually in force at the time of the 1350 limited covered accident exists only if National Railroad 1351 Passenger Corporation agrees, with respect to the limited 1352 covered accident, to protect, defend, and indemnify the 1353 department for the amount of the deductible or self-insurance 1354 retention fund established under paragraph (b) and actually in 1355 force at the time of the limited covered accident. 1356 3.âWhen only one train is involved in an incident, the 1357 department may be solely responsible for any loss, injury, or 1358 damage if the train is a department train or other train 1359 pursuant to subparagraph 4., but only if: 1360 a.âWhen an incident occurs with only a freight train 1361 involved, including incidents with trespassers or at grade 1362 crossings, the freight rail operator is solely responsible for 1363 any loss, injury, or damage, except for commuter rail passengers 1364 and rail corridor invitees; or 1365 b.âWhen an incident occurs with only a National Railroad 1366 Passenger Corporation train involved, including incidents with 1367 trespassers or at grade crossings, National Railroad Passenger 1368 Corporation is solely responsible for any loss, injury, or 1369 damage, except for commuter rail passengers and rail corridor 1370 invitees. 1371 4.âFor the purposes of this subsection: 1372 a.âAny train involved in an incident that is neither the 1373 departmentâs train nor the freight rail operatorâs train, 1374 hereinafter referred to in this subsection as an âother train,â 1375 may be treated as a department train, solely for purposes of any 1376 allocation of liability between the department and the freight 1377 rail operator only, but only if the department and the freight 1378 rail operator share responsibility equally as to third parties 1379 outside the rail corridor who incur loss, injury, or damage as a 1380 result of any incident involving both a department train and a 1381 freight rail operator train, and the allocation as between the 1382 department and the freight rail operator, regardless of whether 1383 the other train is treated as a department train, shall remain 1384 one-half each as to third parties outside the rail corridor who 1385 incur loss, injury, or damage as a result of the incident. The 1386 involvement of any other train shall not alter the sharing of 1387 equal responsibility as to third parties outside the rail 1388 corridor who incur loss, injury, or damage as a result of the 1389 incident; or 1390 b.âAny train involved in an incident that is neither the 1391 departmentâs train nor the National Railroad Passenger 1392 Corporationâs train, hereinafter referred to in this subsection 1393 as an âother train,â may be treated as a department train, 1394 solely for purposes of any allocation of liability between the 1395 department and National Railroad Passenger Corporation only, but 1396 only if the department and National Railroad Passenger 1397 Corporation share responsibility equally as to third parties 1398 outside the rail corridor who incur loss, injury, or damage as a 1399 result of any incident involving both a department train and a 1400 National Railroad Passenger Corporation train, and the 1401 allocation as between the department and National Railroad 1402 Passenger Corporation, regardless of whether the other train is 1403 treated as a department train, shall remain one-half each as to 1404 third parties outside the rail corridor who incur loss, injury, 1405 or damage as a result of the incident. The involvement of any 1406 other train shall not alter the sharing of equal responsibility 1407 as to third parties outside the rail corridor who incur loss, 1408 injury, or damage as a result of the incident. 1409 5.âWhen more than one train is involved in an incident: 1410 a.(I)âIf only a department train and freight rail 1411 operatorâs train, or only an other train as described in sub 1412 subparagraph 4.a. and a freight rail operatorâs train, are 1413 involved in an incident, the department may be responsible for 1414 its property and all of its people, all commuter rail 1415 passengers, and rail corridor invitees, but only if the freight 1416 rail operator is responsible for its property and all of its 1417 people, and the department and the freight rail operator each 1418 share one-half responsibility as to trespassers or third parties 1419 outside the rail corridor who incur loss, injury, or damage as a 1420 result of the incident; or 1421 (II)âIf only a department train and a National Railroad 1422 Passenger Corporation train, or only an other train as described 1423 in sub-subparagraph 4.b. and a National Railroad Passenger 1424 Corporation train, are involved in an incident, the department 1425 may be responsible for its property and all of its people, all 1426 commuter rail passengers, and rail corridor invitees, but only 1427 if National Railroad Passenger Corporation is responsible for 1428 its property and all of its people, all National Railroad 1429 Passenger Corporationâs rail passengers, and the department and 1430 National Railroad Passenger Corporation each share one-half 1431 responsibility as to trespassers or third parties outside the 1432 rail corridor who incur loss, injury, or damage as a result of 1433 the incident. 1434 b.(I)âIf a department train, a freight rail operator train, 1435 and any other train are involved in an incident, the allocation 1436 of liability between the department and the freight rail 1437 operator, regardless of whether the other train is treated as a 1438 department train, shall remain one-half each as to third parties 1439 outside the rail corridor who incur loss, injury, or damage as a 1440 result of the incident; the involvement of any other train shall 1441 not alter the sharing of equal responsibility as to third 1442 parties outside the rail corridor who incur loss, injury, or 1443 damage as a result of the incident; and, if the owner, operator, 1444 or insurer of the other train makes any payment to injured third 1445 parties outside the rail corridor who incur loss, injury, or 1446 damage as a result of the incident, the allocation of credit 1447 between the department and the freight rail operator as to such 1448 payment shall not in any case reduce the freight rail operatorâs 1449 third-party-sharing allocation of one-half under this paragraph 1450 to less than one-third of the total third party liability; or 1451 (II)âIf a department train, a National Railroad Passenger 1452 Corporation train, and any other train are involved in an 1453 incident, the allocation of liability between the department and 1454 National Railroad Passenger Corporation, regardless of whether 1455 the other train is treated as a department train, shall remain 1456 one-half each as to third parties outside the rail corridor who 1457 incur loss, injury, or damage as a result of the incident; the 1458 involvement of any other train shall not alter the sharing of 1459 equal responsibility as to third parties outside the rail 1460 corridor who incur loss, injury, or damage as a result of the 1461 incident; and, if the owner, operator, or insurer of the other 1462 train makes any payment to injured third parties outside the 1463 rail corridor who incur loss, injury, or damage as a result of 1464 the incident, the allocation of credit between the department 1465 and National Railroad Passenger Corporation as to such payment 1466 shall not in any case reduce National Railroad Passenger 1467 Corporationâs third-party-sharing allocation of one-half under 1468 this sub-subparagraph to less than one-third of the total third 1469 party liability. 1470 6.âAny such contractual duty to protect, defend, indemnify, 1471 and hold harmless such a freight rail operator or National 1472 Railroad Passenger Corporation shall expressly include a 1473 specific cap on the amount of the contractual duty, which amount 1474 shall not exceed $200 million without prior legislative 1475 approval, and the department to purchase liability insurance and 1476 establish a self-insurance retention fund in the amount of the 1477 specific cap established under this subparagraph, provided that: 1478 a.âNo such contractual duty shall in any case be effective 1479 nor otherwise extend the departmentâs liability in scope and 1480 effect beyond the contractual liability insurance and self 1481 insurance retention fund required pursuant to this paragraph; 1482 and 1483 b.(I)âThe freight rail operatorâs compensation to the 1484 department for future use of the departmentâs rail corridor 1485 shall include a monetary contribution to the cost of such 1486 liability coverage for the sole benefit of the freight rail 1487 operator. 1488 (II)âNational Railroad Passenger Corporationâs compensation 1489 to the department for future use of the departmentâs rail 1490 corridor shall include a monetary contribution to the cost of 1491 such liability coverage for the sole benefit of National 1492 Railroad Passenger Corporation. 1493 (b)âPurchase liability insurance, which amount shall not 1494 exceed $200 million, and establish a self-insurance retention 1495 fund for the purpose of paying the deductible limit established 1496 in the insurance policies it may obtain, including coverage for 1497 the department, any freight rail operator as described in 1498 paragraph (a), National Railroad Passenger Corporation, commuter 1499 rail service providers, governmental entities, or any ancillary 1500 development, which self-insurance retention fund or deductible 1501 shall not exceed $10 million. The insureds shall pay a 1502 reasonable monetary contribution to the cost of such liability 1503 coverage for the sole benefit of the insured. Such insurance and 1504 self-insurance retention fund may provide coverage for all 1505 damages, including, but not limited to, compensatory, special, 1506 and exemplary, and be maintained to provide an adequate fund to 1507 cover claims and liabilities for loss, injury, or damage arising 1508 out of or connected with the ownership, operation, maintenance, 1509 and management of a rail corridor. 1510 (c)âIncur expenses for the purchase of advertisements, 1511 marketing, and promotional items. 1512 (d)âWithout altering any of the rights granted to the 1513 department under this section, agree to assume the obligations 1514 to indemnify and insure, pursuant to s. 343.545, freight rail 1515 service, intercity passenger rail service, and commuter rail 1516 service on a department-owned rail corridor, whether ownership 1517 is in fee or by easement, or on a rail corridor where the 1518 department has the right to operate. 1519 1520 Neither the assumption by contract to protect, defend, 1521 indemnify, and hold harmless; the purchase of insurance; nor the 1522 establishment of a self-insurance retention fund shall be deemed 1523 to be a waiver of any defense of sovereign immunity for torts 1524 nor deemed to increase the limits of the departmentâs or the 1525 governmental entityâs liability for torts as provided in s. 1526 768.28. The requirements of s. 287.022(1) shall not apply to the 1527 purchase of any insurance under this subsection. The provisions 1528 of this subsection shall apply and inure fully as to any other 1529 governmental entity providing commuter rail service and 1530 constructing, operating, maintaining, or managing a rail 1531 corridor on publicly owned right-of-way under contract by the 1532 governmental entity with the department or a governmental entity 1533 designated by the department. Notwithstanding any law to the 1534 contrary, procurement for the construction, operation, 1535 maintenance, and management of any rail corridor described in 1536 this subsection, whether by the department, a governmental 1537 entity under contract with the department, or a governmental 1538 entity designated by the department, shall be pursuant to s. 1539 287.057 and shall include, but not be limited to, criteria for 1540 the consideration of qualifications, technical aspects of the 1541 proposal, and price. Further, any such contract for design-build 1542 shall be procured pursuant to the criteria in s. 337.11(7). 1543 Section 24.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1544 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 1545 reference thereto, subsection (3) of section 343.811, Florida 1546 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1547 343.811âPower to assume indemnification and insurance 1548 obligations.â 1549 (3)âASSUMPTION OF OBLIGATIONS; PURCHASE OF INSURANCE.âIn 1550 conjunction with the development or operation of a commuter rail 1551 service on the Coastal Link corridor, an agency may: 1552 (a)âAssume obligations pursuant to the following: 1553 1.a.âThe agency may assume the obligation by contract to 1554 protect, defend, indemnify, and hold harmless FECR and its 1555 officers, agents, and employees from and against: 1556 (I)âAny liability, cost, and expense, including, but not 1557 limited to, the agencyâs passengers and other rail corridor 1558 invitees in, on, or about the Coastal Link corridor, regardless 1559 of whether the loss, damage, destruction, injury, or death 1560 giving rise to any such liability, cost, or expense is caused in 1561 whole or in part, and to whatever nature or degree, by the 1562 fault, failure, negligence, misconduct, nonfeasance, or 1563 misfeasance of such freight rail operator, its successors, or 1564 its officers, agents, and employees, or any other person or 1565 persons whomsoever. 1566 (II)âAny loss, injury, or damage incurred by other rail 1567 corridor invitees up to the amount of the self-insurance 1568 retention amount with respect to limited covered accidents 1569 caused by the agency. 1570 b.âThe agency may assume the obligation by contract to 1571 protect, defend, indemnify, and hold harmless Brightline and its 1572 officers, agents, and employees from and against: 1573 (I)âAny liability, cost, and expense, including, but not 1574 limited to, the agencyâs passengers and rail corridor invitees 1575 in the Coastal Link corridor, regardless of whether the loss, 1576 damage, destruction, injury, or death giving rise to any such 1577 liability, cost, or expense is caused in whole or in part, and 1578 to whatever nature or degree, by the fault, failure, negligence, 1579 misconduct, nonfeasance, or misfeasance of Brightline, its 1580 successors, or its officers, agents, and employees, or any other 1581 person or persons whomsoever. 1582 (II)âAny loss, injury, or damage incurred by other rail 1583 corridor invitees up to the amount of the self-insurance 1584 retention amount with respect to limited covered accidents 1585 caused by the agency. 1586 2.âThe assumption of liability of the agency by contract 1587 pursuant to sub-subparagraph 1.a. or sub-subparagraph 1.b. may 1588 not in any instance exceed the following parameters of 1589 allocation of risk: 1590 a.âThe agency may be solely responsible for any loss, 1591 injury, or damage to the agencyâs passengers, or rail corridor 1592 invitees, third parties, or trespassers, regardless of 1593 circumstances or cause, subject to sub-subparagraph b. and 1594 subparagraphs 3., 4., and 5. 1595 b.(I)âIn the event of a limited covered accident caused by 1596 FECR, the authority of an agency to protect, defend, and 1597 indemnify FECR for all liability, cost, and expense, including 1598 punitive or exemplary damages, in excess of the self-insurance 1599 retention amount exists only if FECR agrees, with respect to 1600 such limited covered accident caused by FECR, to protect, 1601 defend, and indemnify the agency for the amount of the self 1602 insurance retention amount. 1603 (II)âIn the event of a limited covered accident caused by 1604 Brightline, the authority of an agency to protect, defend, and 1605 indemnify Brightline for all liability, cost, and expense, 1606 including punitive or exemplary damages, in excess of the self 1607 insurance retention amount exists only if Brightline agrees, 1608 with respect to such limited covered accident, to protect, 1609 defend, and indemnify the agency for the amount of the self 1610 insurance retention amount. 1611 3.âWhen only one train is involved in an incident and: 1612 a.âThe train is an agencyâs train, including an incident 1613 with trespassers or at-grade crossings, the agency may be solely 1614 responsible for any loss, injury, or damage. 1615 b.âThe train is FECRâs train, including an incident with 1616 trespassers or at-grade crossings, FECR is solely responsible 1617 for any loss, injury, or damage, except for the agencyâs 1618 passengers and other rail corridor invitees, which are the 1619 responsibility of the agency, and Brightlineâs passengers and 1620 other rail corridor invitees, which are the responsibility of 1621 Brightline. 1622 c.âThe train is Brightlineâs train, including an incident 1623 with trespassers or at-grade crossings, Brightline is solely 1624 responsible for any loss, injury, or damage, except for the 1625 agencyâs passengers or rail corridor invitees, which are the 1626 responsibility of the agency, and FECRâs rail corridor invitees, 1627 which are the responsibility of FECR. 1628 4.âWhen an incident involves more than one operator, each 1629 operator is responsible for: 1630 a.âIts property; passengers; employees, excluding employees 1631 who are, at the time of the incident, rail corridor invitees of 1632 another operator; and other rail corridor invitees. 1633 b.âIts proportionate share of any loss or damage to the 1634 joint infrastructure. 1635 c.âIts proportionate share of any loss, injury, or damage 1636 to: 1637 (I)âRail corridor invitees who are not rail corridor 1638 invitees of operators, provided that the agency shall always be 1639 responsible for its passengers and its rail corridor invitees 1640 regardless of whether the agency was involved in the incident. 1641 (II)âTrespassers or third parties outside the Coastal Link 1642 corridor as a result of the incident. 1643 5.âAny such contractual duty to protect, defend, indemnify, 1644 and hold harmless FECR or Brightline with respect to claims by 1645 rail passengers shall expressly include a specific cap on the 1646 amount of the contractual duty, which amount may not exceed $323 1647 million per occurrence and shall be adjusted so that the per 1648 occurrence insurance requirement is equal to the aggregate 1649 allowable awards to all rail passengers, against all defendants, 1650 for all claims, including claims for punitive damages, arising 1651 from a single accident or incident in accordance with 49 U.S.C. 1652 s. 28103, or any successor provision, without prior legislative 1653 approval. 1654 6.âNotwithstanding any provision of this section to the 1655 contrary, the liabilities of the agency to the state or any 1656 other agency shall be as set forth in an agreement among such 1657 entities and limited by s. 768.28(19). 1658 (b)âPurchase liability insurance, which amount may not 1659 exceed $323 million per occurrence, which amount shall be 1660 adjusted so that the per-occurrence insurance requirement is 1661 equal to the aggregate allowable awards to all rail passengers, 1662 against all defendants, for all claims, including claims for 1663 punitive damages, arising from a single accident or incident in 1664 accordance with 49 U.S.C. s. 28103, or any successor provision, 1665 and establish a self-insurance retention fund for the purpose of 1666 paying the deductible limit established in the insurance 1667 policies it may obtain, including coverage for a county agency, 1668 any freight rail operator as described in paragraph (a), 1669 Brightline, commuter rail service providers, governmental 1670 entities, or any ancillary development, which self-insurance 1671 retention fund or deductible shall not exceed the self-insurance 1672 retention amount. 1673 1.âSuch insurance and self-insurance retention fund may 1674 provide coverage for all damages, including, but not limited to, 1675 compensatory, special, and exemplary, and be maintained to 1676 provide an adequate fund to cover claims and liabilities for 1677 loss, injury, or damage arising out of or connected with the 1678 ownership, operation, maintenance, and management of the Coastal 1679 Link corridor. 1680 2.âAny self-insured retention account shall be a segregated 1681 account of the agency and shall be subject to the same 1682 conditions, restrictions, exclusions, obligations, and duties 1683 included in any and all of the policies of liability insurance 1684 purchased under this paragraph. 1685 3.âUnless otherwise specifically provided by general law, 1686 FECR and Brightline, and their respective officers, agents, and 1687 employees, are not officers, agents, employees, or subdivisions 1688 of the state and are not entitled to sovereign immunity. 1689 1690 Neither the assumption by contract to protect, defend, 1691 indemnify, and hold harmless; the purchase of insurance; nor the 1692 establishment of a self-insurance retention fund shall be deemed 1693 to be a waiver of any defense of sovereign immunity for tort 1694 claims or deemed to increase the limits of the agencyâs 1695 liability for tort claims as provided in s. 768.28. 1696 Section 25.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1697 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 1698 reference thereto, paragraph (c) of subsection (4) of section 1699 351.03, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1700 351.03âRailroad-highway grade-crossing warning signs and 1701 signals; audible warnings; exercise of reasonable care; blocking 1702 highways, roads, and streets during darkness.â 1703 (4) 1704 (c)âNothing in this subsection shall be construed to 1705 nullify the liability provisions of s. 768.28. 1706 Section 26.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1707 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 1708 reference thereto, subsection (6) of section 373.1395, Florida 1709 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1710 373.1395âLimitation on liability of water management 1711 district with respect to areas made available to the public for 1712 recreational purposes without charge.â 1713 (6)âThis section does not relieve any water management 1714 district of any liability that would otherwise exist for gross 1715 negligence or a deliberate, willful, or malicious injury to a 1716 person or property. This section does not create or increase the 1717 liability of any water management district or person beyond that 1718 which is authorized by s. 768.28. 1719 Section 27.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1720 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 1721 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 1722 375.251, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1723 375.251âLimitation on liability of persons making available 1724 to public certain areas for recreational purposes without 1725 charge.â 1726 (3)(a)âAn owner of an area who enters into a written 1727 agreement concerning the area with a state agency for outdoor 1728 recreational purposes, where such agreement recognizes that the 1729 state agency is responsible for personal injury, loss, or damage 1730 resulting in whole or in part from the state agencyâs use of the 1731 area under the terms of the agreement subject to the limitations 1732 and conditions specified in s. 768.28, owes no duty of care to 1733 keep the area safe for entry or use by others, or to give 1734 warning to persons entering or going on the area of any 1735 hazardous conditions, structures, or activities thereon. An 1736 owner who enters into a written agreement concerning the area 1737 with a state agency for outdoor recreational purposes: 1738 1.âIs not presumed to extend any assurance that the area is 1739 safe for any purpose; 1740 2.âDoes not incur any duty of care toward a person who goes 1741 on the area that is subject to the agreement; or 1742 3.âIs not liable or responsible for any injury to persons 1743 or property caused by the act or omission of a person who goes 1744 on the area that is subject to the agreement. 1745 Section 28.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1746 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 1747 reference thereto, subsection (9) of section 381.0056, Florida 1748 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1749 381.0056âSchool health services program.â 1750 (9)âAny health care entity that provides school health 1751 services under contract with the department pursuant to a school 1752 health services plan developed under this section, and as part 1753 of a school nurse services public-private partnership, is deemed 1754 to be a corporation acting primarily as an instrumentality of 1755 the state solely for the purpose of limiting liability pursuant 1756 to s. 768.28(5). The limitations on tort actions contained in s. 1757 768.28(5) shall apply to any action against the entity with 1758 respect to the provision of school health services, if the 1759 entity is acting within the scope of and pursuant to guidelines 1760 established in the contract or by rule of the department. The 1761 contract must require the entity, or the partnership on behalf 1762 of the entity, to obtain general liability insurance coverage, 1763 with any additional endorsement necessary to insure the entity 1764 for liability assumed by its contract with the department. The 1765 Legislature intends that insurance be purchased by entities, or 1766 by partnerships on behalf of the entity, to cover all liability 1767 claims, and under no circumstances shall the state or the 1768 department be responsible for payment of any claims or defense 1769 costs for claims brought against the entity or its subcontractor 1770 for services performed under the contract with the department. 1771 This subsection does not preclude consideration by the 1772 Legislature for payment by the state of any claims bill 1773 involving an entity contracting with the department pursuant to 1774 this section. 1775 Section 29.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1776 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 1777 reference thereto, subsection (3) of section 393.075, Florida 1778 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1779 393.075âGeneral liability coverage.â 1780 (3)âThis section shall not be construed as designating or 1781 not designating that a person who owns or operates a foster care 1782 facility or group home facility as described in this section or 1783 any other person is an employee or agent of the state. Nothing 1784 in this section amends, expands, or supersedes the provisions of 1785 s. 768.28. 1786 Section 30.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1787 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 1788 reference thereto, subsection (7) of section 394.9085, Florida 1789 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1790 394.9085âBehavioral provider liability.â 1791 (7)âThis section shall not be construed to waive sovereign 1792 immunity for any governmental unit or other entity protected by 1793 sovereign immunity. Section 768.28 shall continue to apply to 1794 all governmental units and such entities. 1795 Section 31.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1796 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 1797 reference thereto, paragraph (g) of subsection (10) of section 1798 395.1055, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1799 395.1055âRules and enforcement.â 1800 (10)âThe agency shall establish a pediatric cardiac 1801 technical advisory panel, pursuant to s. 20.052, to develop 1802 procedures and standards for measuring outcomes of pediatric 1803 cardiac catheterization programs and pediatric cardiovascular 1804 surgery programs. 1805 (g)âPanel members are agents of the state for purposes of 1806 s. 768.28 throughout the good faith performance of the duties 1807 assigned to them by the Secretary of Health Care Administration. 1808 Section 32.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1809 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 1810 reference thereto, paragraph (c) of subsection (17) of section 1811 403.706, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1812 403.706âLocal government solid waste responsibilities.â 1813 (17)âTo effect the purposes of this part, counties and 1814 municipalities are authorized, in addition to other powers 1815 granted pursuant to this part: 1816 (c)âTo waive sovereign immunity and immunity from suit in 1817 federal court by vote of the governing body of the county or 1818 municipality to the extent necessary to carry out the authority 1819 granted in paragraphs (a) and (b), notwithstanding the 1820 limitations prescribed in s. 768.28. 1821 Section 33.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1822 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 1823 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (15) of section 1824 409.175, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1825 409.175âLicensure of family foster homes, residential 1826 child-caring agencies, and child-placing agencies; public 1827 records exemption.â 1828 (15) 1829 (b)âThis subsection may not be construed as designating or 1830 not designating that a person who owns or operates a family 1831 foster home as described in this subsection or any other person 1832 is an employee or agent of the state. Nothing in this subsection 1833 amends, expands, or supersedes the provisions of s. 768.28. 1834 Section 34.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1835 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in 1836 references thereto, subsection (1), paragraph (a) of subsection 1837 (2), and paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 409.993, 1838 Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read: 1839 409.993âLead agencies and subcontractor liability.â 1840 (1)âFINDINGS.â 1841 (a)âThe Legislature finds that the state has traditionally 1842 provided foster care services to children who are the 1843 responsibility of the state. As such, foster children have not 1844 had the right to recover for injuries beyond the limitations 1845 specified in s. 768.28. The Legislature has determined that 1846 foster care and related services should be outsourced pursuant 1847 to this section and that the provision of such services is of 1848 paramount importance to the state. The purpose of such 1849 outsourcing is to increase the level of safety, security, and 1850 stability of children who are or become the responsibility of 1851 the state. One of the components necessary to secure a safe and 1852 stable environment for such children is the requirement that 1853 private providers maintain liability insurance. As such, 1854 insurance needs to be available and remain available to 1855 nongovernmental foster care and related services providers 1856 without the resources of such providers being significantly 1857 reduced by the cost of maintaining such insurance. 1858 (b)âThe Legislature further finds that, by requiring the 1859 following minimum levels of insurance, children in outsourced 1860 foster care and related services will gain increased protection 1861 and rights of recovery in the event of injury than currently 1862 provided in s. 768.28. 1863 (2)âLEAD AGENCY LIABILITY.â 1864 (a)âOther than an entity to which s. 768.28 applies, an 1865 eligible community-based care lead agency, or its employees or 1866 officers, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), shall, 1867 as a part of its contract, obtain a minimum of $1 million per 1868 occurrence with a policy period aggregate limit of $3 million in 1869 general liability insurance coverage. The lead agency must also 1870 require that staff who transport client children and families in 1871 their personal automobiles in order to carry out their job 1872 responsibilities obtain minimum bodily injury liability 1873 insurance in the amount of $100,000 per person per any one 1874 automobile accident, and subject to such limits for each person, 1875 $300,000 for all damages resulting from any one automobile 1876 accident, on their personal automobiles. In lieu of personal 1877 motor vehicle insurance, the lead agencyâs casualty, liability, 1878 or motor vehicle insurance carrier may provide nonowned 1879 automobile liability coverage. This insurance provides liability 1880 insurance for an automobile that the lead agency uses in 1881 connection with the lead agencyâs business but does not own, 1882 lease, rent, or borrow. This coverage includes an automobile 1883 owned by an employee of the lead agency or a member of the 1884 employeeâs household but only while the automobile is used in 1885 connection with the lead agencyâs business. The nonowned 1886 automobile coverage for the lead agency applies as excess 1887 coverage over any other collectible insurance. The personal 1888 automobile policy for the employee of the lead agency shall be 1889 primary insurance, and the nonowned automobile coverage of the 1890 lead agency acts as excess insurance to the primary insurance. 1891 The lead agency shall provide a minimum limit of $1 million in 1892 nonowned automobile coverage. In a tort action brought against 1893 such a lead agency or employee, net economic damages shall be 1894 limited to $2 million per liability claim and $200,000 per 1895 automobile claim, including, but not limited to, past and future 1896 medical expenses, wage loss, and loss of earning capacity, 1897 offset by any collateral source payment paid or payable. In any 1898 tort action brought against a lead agency, noneconomic damages 1899 shall be limited to $400,000 per claim. A claims bill may be 1900 brought on behalf of a claimant pursuant to s. 768.28 for any 1901 amount exceeding the limits specified in this paragraph. Any 1902 offset of collateral source payments made as of the date of the 1903 settlement or judgment shall be in accordance with s. 768.76. 1904 The lead agency is not liable in tort for the acts or omissions 1905 of its subcontractors or the officers, agents, or employees of 1906 its subcontractors. 1907 (3)âSUBCONTRACTOR LIABILITY.â 1908 (a)âA subcontractor of an eligible community-based care 1909 lead agency that is a direct provider of foster care and related 1910 services to children and families, and its employees or 1911 officers, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (c), must, 1912 as a part of its contract, obtain a minimum of $1 million per 1913 occurrence with a policy period aggregate limit of $3 million in 1914 general liability insurance coverage. The subcontractor of a 1915 lead agency must also require that staff who transport client 1916 children and families in their personal automobiles in order to 1917 carry out their job responsibilities obtain minimum bodily 1918 injury liability insurance in the amount of $100,000 per person 1919 in any one automobile accident, and subject to such limits for 1920 each person, $300,000 for all damages resulting from any one 1921 automobile accident, on their personal automobiles. In lieu of 1922 personal motor vehicle insurance, the subcontractorâs casualty, 1923 liability, or motor vehicle insurance carrier may provide 1924 nonowned automobile liability coverage. This insurance provides 1925 liability insurance for automobiles that the subcontractor uses 1926 in connection with the subcontractorâs business but does not 1927 own, lease, rent, or borrow. This coverage includes automobiles 1928 owned by the employees of the subcontractor or a member of the 1929 employeeâs household but only while the automobiles are used in 1930 connection with the subcontractorâs business. The nonowned 1931 automobile coverage for the subcontractor applies as excess 1932 coverage over any other collectible insurance. The personal 1933 automobile policy for the employee of the subcontractor shall be 1934 primary insurance, and the nonowned automobile coverage of the 1935 subcontractor acts as excess insurance to the primary insurance. 1936 The subcontractor shall provide a minimum limit of $1 million in 1937 nonowned automobile coverage. In a tort action brought against 1938 such subcontractor or employee, net economic damages shall be 1939 limited to $2 million per liability claim and $200,000 per 1940 automobile claim, including, but not limited to, past and future 1941 medical expenses, wage loss, and loss of earning capacity, 1942 offset by any collateral source payment paid or payable. In a 1943 tort action brought against such subcontractor, noneconomic 1944 damages shall be limited to $400,000 per claim. A claims bill 1945 may be brought on behalf of a claimant pursuant to s. 768.28 for 1946 any amount exceeding the limits specified in this paragraph. Any 1947 offset of collateral source payments made as of the date of the 1948 settlement or judgment shall be in accordance with s. 768.76. 1949 Section 35.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1950 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 1951 reference thereto, subsection (8) of section 420.504, Florida 1952 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1953 420.504âPublic corporation; creation, membership, terms, 1954 expenses.â 1955 (8)âThe corporation is a corporation primarily acting as an 1956 instrumentality of the state, within the meaning of s. 768.28. 1957 Section 36.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1958 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 1959 reference thereto, subsection (3) of section 455.221, Florida 1960 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1961 455.221âLegal and investigative services.â 1962 (3)âAny person retained by the department under contract to 1963 review materials, make site visits, or provide expert testimony 1964 regarding any complaint or application filed with the department 1965 relating to a profession under the jurisdiction of the 1966 department shall be considered an agent of the department in 1967 determining the state insurance coverage and sovereign immunity 1968 protection applicability of ss. 284.31 and 768.28. 1969 Section 37.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1970 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 1971 reference thereto, subsection (5) of section 455.32, Florida 1972 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1973 455.32âManagement Privatization Act.â 1974 (5)âAny such corporation may hire staff as necessary to 1975 carry out its functions. Such staff are not public employees for 1976 the purposes of chapter 110 or chapter 112, except that the 1977 board of directors and the employees of the corporation are 1978 subject to the provisions of s. 112.061 and part III of chapter 1979 112. The provisions of s. 768.28 apply to each such corporation, 1980 which is deemed to be a corporation primarily acting as an 1981 instrumentality of the state but which is not an agency within 1982 the meaning of s. 20.03(1). 1983 Section 38.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1984 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 1985 reference thereto, subsection (3) of section 456.009, Florida 1986 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1987 456.009âLegal and investigative services.â 1988 (3)âAny person retained by the department under contract to 1989 review materials, make site visits, or provide expert testimony 1990 regarding any complaint or application filed with the department 1991 relating to a profession under the jurisdiction of the 1992 department shall be considered an agent of the department in 1993 determining the state insurance coverage and sovereign immunity 1994 protection applicability of ss. 284.31 and 768.28. 1995 Section 39.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1996 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 1997 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (15) of section 1998 456.076, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1999 456.076âImpaired practitioner programs.â 2000 (15)(a)âA consultant retained pursuant to this section and 2001 a consultantâs directors, officers, employees, or agents shall 2002 be considered agents of the department for purposes of s. 768.28 2003 while acting within the scope of the consultantâs duties under 2004 the contract with the department. 2005 Section 40.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2006 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 2007 reference thereto, subsection (3) of section 471.038, Florida 2008 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2009 471.038âFlorida Engineers Management Corporation.â 2010 (3)âThe Florida Engineers Management Corporation is created 2011 to provide administrative, investigative, and prosecutorial 2012 services to the board in accordance with the provisions of 2013 chapter 455 and this chapter. The management corporation may 2014 hire staff as necessary to carry out its functions. Such staff 2015 are not public employees for the purposes of chapter 110 or 2016 chapter 112, except that the board of directors and the staff 2017 are subject to the provisions of s. 112.061. The provisions of 2018 s. 768.28 apply to the management corporation, which is deemed 2019 to be a corporation primarily acting as an instrumentality of 2020 the state, but which is not an agency within the meaning of s. 2021 20.03(1). The management corporation shall: 2022 (a)âBe a Florida corporation not for profit, incorporated 2023 under the provisions of chapter 617. 2024 (b)âProvide administrative, investigative, and 2025 prosecutorial services to the board in accordance with the 2026 provisions of chapter 455, this chapter, and the contract 2027 required by this section. 2028 (c)âReceive, hold, and administer property and make only 2029 prudent expenditures directly related to the responsibilities of 2030 the board, and in accordance with the contract required by this 2031 section. 2032 (d)âBe approved by the board, and the department, to 2033 operate for the benefit of the board and in the best interest of 2034 the state. 2035 (e)âOperate under a fiscal year that begins on July 1 of 2036 each year and ends on June 30 of the following year. 2037 (f)âHave a seven-member board of directors, five of whom 2038 are to be appointed by the board and must be registrants 2039 regulated by the board and two of whom are to be appointed by 2040 the secretary and must be laypersons not regulated by the board. 2041 All appointments shall be for 4-year terms. No member shall 2042 serve more than two consecutive terms. Failure to attend three 2043 consecutive meetings shall be deemed a resignation from the 2044 board, and the vacancy shall be filled by a new appointment. 2045 (g)âSelect its officers in accordance with its bylaws. The 2046 members of the board of directors who were appointed by the 2047 board may be removed by the board. 2048 (h)âSelect the president of the management corporation, who 2049 shall also serve as executive director to the board, subject to 2050 approval of the board. 2051 (i)âUse a portion of the interest derived from the 2052 management corporation account to offset the costs associated 2053 with the use of credit cards for payment of fees by applicants 2054 or licensees. 2055 (j)âOperate under a written contract with the department 2056 which is approved by the board. The contract must provide for, 2057 but is not limited to: 2058 1.âSubmission by the management corporation of an annual 2059 budget that complies with board rules for approval by the board 2060 and the department. 2061 2.âAnnual certification by the board and the department 2062 that the management corporation is complying with the terms of 2063 the contract in a manner consistent with the goals and purposes 2064 of the board and in the best interest of the state. This 2065 certification must be reported in the boardâs minutes. The 2066 contract must also provide for methods and mechanisms to resolve 2067 any situation in which the certification process determines 2068 noncompliance. 2069 3.âFunding of the management corporation through 2070 appropriations allocated to the regulation of professional 2071 engineers from the Professional Regulation Trust Fund. 2072 4.âThe reversion to the board, or the state if the board 2073 ceases to exist, of moneys, records, data, and property held in 2074 trust by the management corporation for the benefit of the 2075 board, if the management corporation is no longer approved to 2076 operate for the board or the board ceases to exist. All records 2077 and data in a computerized database shall be returned to the 2078 department in a form that is compatible with the computerized 2079 database of the department. 2080 5.âThe securing and maintaining by the management 2081 corporation, during the term of the contract and for all acts 2082 performed during the term of the contract, of all liability 2083 insurance coverages in an amount to be approved by the board to 2084 defend, indemnify, and hold harmless the management corporation 2085 and its officers and employees, the department and its 2086 employees, and the state against all claims arising from state 2087 and federal laws. Such insurance coverage must be with insurers 2088 qualified and doing business in the state. The management 2089 corporation must provide proof of insurance to the department. 2090 The department and its employees and the state are exempt from 2091 and are not liable for any sum of money which represents a 2092 deductible, which sums shall be the sole responsibility of the 2093 management corporation. Violation of this subparagraph shall be 2094 grounds for terminating the contract. 2095 6.âPayment by the management corporation, out of its 2096 allocated budget, to the department of all costs of 2097 representation by the board counsel, including salary and 2098 benefits, travel, and any other compensation traditionally paid 2099 by the department to other board counsel. 2100 7.âPayment by the management corporation, out of its 2101 allocated budget, to the department of all costs incurred by the 2102 management corporation or the board for the Division of 2103 Administrative Hearings of the Department of Management Services 2104 and any other cost for utilization of these state services. 2105 8.âPayment by the management corporation, out of its 2106 allocated budget, to the department of reasonable costs 2107 associated with the contract monitor. 2108 (k)âProvide for an annual financial audit of its financial 2109 accounts and records by an independent certified public 2110 accountant. The annual audit report shall include a management 2111 letter in accordance with s. 11.45 and a detailed supplemental 2112 schedule of expenditures for each expenditure category. The 2113 annual audit report must be submitted to the board, the 2114 department, and the Auditor General for review. 2115 (l)âProvide for persons not employed by the corporation who 2116 are charged with the responsibility of receiving and depositing 2117 fee and fine revenues to have a faithful performance bond in 2118 such an amount and according to such terms as shall be 2119 determined in the contract. 2120 (m)âSubmit to the secretary, the board, and the 2121 Legislature, on or before October 1 of each year, a report on 2122 the status of the corporation which includes, but is not limited 2123 to, information concerning the programs and funds that have been 2124 transferred to the corporation. The report must include: the 2125 number of license applications received; the number approved and 2126 denied and the number of licenses issued; the number of 2127 examinations administered and the number of applicants who 2128 passed or failed the examination; the number of complaints 2129 received; the number determined to be legally sufficient; the 2130 number dismissed; the number determined to have probable cause; 2131 the number of administrative complaints issued and the status of 2132 the complaints; and the number and nature of disciplinary 2133 actions taken by the board. 2134 (n)âDevelop and submit to the department, performance 2135 standards and measurable outcomes for the board to adopt by rule 2136 in order to facilitate efficient and cost-effective regulation. 2137 Section 41.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2138 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 2139 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (11) of section 2140 472.006, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2141 472.006âDepartment; powers and duties.âThe department 2142 shall: 2143 (11)âProvide legal counsel for the board by contracting 2144 with the Department of Legal Affairs, by retaining private 2145 counsel pursuant to s. 287.059, or by providing department staff 2146 counsel. The board shall periodically review and evaluate the 2147 services provided by its board counsel. Fees and costs of such 2148 counsel shall be paid from the General Inspection Trust Fund, 2149 subject to ss. 215.37 and 472.011. All contracts for independent 2150 legal counsel must provide for periodic review and evaluation by 2151 the board and the department of services provided. 2152 (b)âAny person retained by the department under contract to 2153 review materials, make site visits, or provide expert testimony 2154 regarding any complaint or application filed with the department 2155 relating to the practice of surveying and mapping shall be 2156 considered an agent of the department in determining the state 2157 insurance coverage and sovereign immunity protection 2158 applicability of ss. 284.31 and 768.28. 2159 Section 42.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2160 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 2161 reference thereto, subsection (7) of section 497.167, Florida 2162 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2163 497.167âAdministrative matters.â 2164 (7)âAny person retained by the department under contract to 2165 review materials, make site visits, or provide expert testimony 2166 regarding any complaint or application filed with the 2167 department, relating to regulation under this chapter, shall be 2168 considered an agent of the department in determining the state 2169 insurance coverage and sovereign immunity protection 2170 applicability of ss. 284.31 and 768.28. 2171 Section 43.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2172 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 2173 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 513.118, Florida 2174 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2175 513.118âConduct on premises; refusal of service.â 2176 (2)âThe operator of a recreational vehicle park may request 2177 that a transient guest or visitor who violates subsection (1) 2178 leave the premises immediately. A person who refuses to leave 2179 the premises commits the offense of trespass as provided in s. 2180 810.08, and the operator may call a law enforcement officer to 2181 have the person and his or her property removed under the 2182 supervision of the officer. A law enforcement officer is not 2183 liable for any claim involving the removal of the person or 2184 property from the recreational vehicle park under this section, 2185 except as provided in s. 768.28. If conditions do not allow for 2186 immediate removal of the personâs property, he or she may 2187 arrange a reasonable time, not to exceed 48 hours, with the 2188 operator to come remove the property, accompanied by a law 2189 enforcement officer. 2190 Section 44.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2191 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 2192 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 548.046, Florida 2193 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2194 548.046âPhysicianâs attendance at match; examinations; 2195 cancellation of match.â 2196 (1)âThe commission, or the commission representative, shall 2197 assign to each match at least one physician who shall observe 2198 the physical condition of the participants and advise the 2199 commissioner or commission representative in charge and the 2200 referee of the participantsâ conditions before, during, and 2201 after the match. The commission shall establish a schedule of 2202 fees for the physicianâs services. The physicianâs fee shall be 2203 paid by the promoter of the match attended by the physician. The 2204 physician shall be considered an agent of the commission in 2205 determining the state insurance coverage and sovereign immunity 2206 protection applicability of ss. 284.31 and 768.28. 2207 Section 45.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2208 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 2209 reference thereto, subsection (8) of section 556.106, Florida 2210 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2211 556.106âLiability of the member operator, excavator, and 2212 system.â 2213 (8)âAny liability of the state, its agencies, or its 2214 subdivisions which arises out of this chapter is subject to the 2215 provisions of s. 768.28. 2216 Section 46.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2217 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 2218 reference thereto, paragraph (e) of subsection (4) of section 2219 589.19, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2220 589.19âCreation of certain state forests; naming of certain 2221 state forests; Operation Outdoor Freedom Program.â 2222 (4) 2223 (e)1.âA private landowner who provides land for designation 2224 and use as an Operation Outdoor Freedom Program hunting site 2225 shall have limited liability pursuant to s. 375.251. 2226 2.âA private landowner who consents to the designation and 2227 use of land as part of the Operation Outdoor Freedom Program 2228 without compensation shall be considered a volunteer, as defined 2229 in s. 110.501, and shall be covered by state liability 2230 protection pursuant to s. 768.28, including s. 768.28(9). 2231 3.âThis subsection does not: 2232 a.âRelieve any person of liability that would otherwise 2233 exist for deliberate, willful, or malicious injury to persons or 2234 property. 2235 b.âCreate or increase the liability of any person. 2236 Section 47.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2237 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in 2238 references thereto, subsections (3) and (4) of section 627.7491, 2239 Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read: 2240 627.7491âOfficial law enforcement vehicles; motor vehicle 2241 insurance requirements.â 2242 (3)âAny suit or action brought or maintained against an 2243 employing agency for damages arising out of tort pursuant to 2244 this section, including, without limitation, any claim arising 2245 upon account of an act causing loss of property, personal 2246 injury, or death, shall be subject to the limitations provided 2247 in s. 768.28(5). 2248 (4)âThe requirements of this section may be met by any 2249 method authorized by s. 768.28(16). 2250 Section 48.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2251 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 2252 reference thereto, paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 2253 723.0611, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2254 723.0611âFlorida Mobile Home Relocation Corporation.â 2255 (2) 2256 (c)âThe corporation shall, for purposes of s. 768.28, be 2257 considered an agency of the state. Agents or employees of the 2258 corporation, members of the board of directors of the 2259 corporation, or representatives of the Division of Florida 2260 Condominiums, Timeshares, and Mobile Homes shall be considered 2261 officers, employees, or agents of the state, and actions against 2262 them and the corporation shall be governed by s. 768.28. 2263 Section 49.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2264 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 2265 reference thereto, subsection (5) of section 760.11, Florida 2266 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2267 760.11âAdministrative and civil remedies; construction.â 2268 (5)âIn any civil action brought under this section, the 2269 court may issue an order prohibiting the discriminatory practice 2270 and providing affirmative relief from the effects of the 2271 practice, including back pay. The court may also award 2272 compensatory damages, including, but not limited to, damages for 2273 mental anguish, loss of dignity, and any other intangible 2274 injuries, and punitive damages. The provisions of ss. 768.72 and 2275 768.73 do not apply to this section. The judgment for the total 2276 amount of punitive damages awarded under this section to an 2277 aggrieved person shall not exceed $100,000. In any action or 2278 proceeding under this subsection, the court, in its discretion, 2279 may allow the prevailing party a reasonable attorneyâs fee as 2280 part of the costs. It is the intent of the Legislature that this 2281 provision for attorneyâs fees be interpreted in a manner 2282 consistent with federal case law involving a Title VII action. 2283 The right to trial by jury is preserved in any such private 2284 right of action in which the aggrieved person is seeking 2285 compensatory or punitive damages, and any party may demand a 2286 trial by jury. The commissionâs determination of reasonable 2287 cause is not admissible into evidence in any civil proceeding, 2288 including any hearing or trial, except to establish for the 2289 court the right to maintain the private right of action. A civil 2290 action brought under this section shall be commenced no later 2291 than 1 year after the date of determination of reasonable cause 2292 by the commission. The commencement of such action shall divest 2293 the commission of jurisdiction of the complaint, except that the 2294 commission may intervene in the civil action as a matter of 2295 right. Notwithstanding the above, the state and its agencies and 2296 subdivisions shall not be liable for punitive damages. The total 2297 amount of recovery against the state and its agencies and 2298 subdivisions shall not exceed the limitation as set forth in s. 2299 768.28(5). 2300 Section 50.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2301 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 2302 reference thereto, subsection (4) of section 766.1115, Florida 2303 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2304 766.1115âHealth care providers; creation of agency 2305 relationship with governmental contractors.â 2306 (4)âCONTRACT REQUIREMENTS.âA health care provider that 2307 executes a contract with a governmental contractor to deliver 2308 health care services on or after April 17, 1992, as an agent of 2309 the governmental contractor is an agent for purposes of s. 2310 768.28(9), while acting within the scope of duties under the 2311 contract, if the contract complies with the requirements of this 2312 section and regardless of whether the individual treated is 2313 later found to be ineligible. A health care provider shall 2314 continue to be an agent for purposes of s. 768.28(9) for 30 days 2315 after a determination of ineligibility to allow for treatment 2316 until the individual transitions to treatment by another health 2317 care provider. A health care provider under contract with the 2318 state may not be named as a defendant in any action arising out 2319 of medical care or treatment provided on or after April 17, 2320 1992, under contracts entered into under this section. The 2321 contract must provide that: 2322 (a)âThe right of dismissal or termination of any health 2323 care provider delivering services under the contract is retained 2324 by the governmental contractor. 2325 (b)âThe governmental contractor has access to the patient 2326 records of any health care provider delivering services under 2327 the contract. 2328 (c)âAdverse incidents and information on treatment outcomes 2329 must be reported by any health care provider to the governmental 2330 contractor if the incidents and information pertain to a patient 2331 treated under the contract. The health care provider shall 2332 submit the reports required by s. 395.0197. If an incident 2333 involves a professional licensed by the Department of Health or 2334 a facility licensed by the Agency for Health Care 2335 Administration, the governmental contractor shall submit such 2336 incident reports to the appropriate department or agency, which 2337 shall review each incident and determine whether it involves 2338 conduct by the licensee that is subject to disciplinary action. 2339 All patient medical records and any identifying information 2340 contained in adverse incident reports and treatment outcomes 2341 which are obtained by governmental entities under this paragraph 2342 are confidential and exempt from the provisions of s. 119.07(1) 2343 and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 2344 (d)âPatient selection and initial referral must be made by 2345 the governmental contractor or the provider. Patients may not be 2346 transferred to the provider based on a violation of the 2347 antidumping provisions of the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act 2348 of 1989, the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1990, or 2349 chapter 395. 2350 (e)âIf emergency care is required, the patient need not be 2351 referred before receiving treatment, but must be referred within 2352 48 hours after treatment is commenced or within 48 hours after 2353 the patient has the mental capacity to consent to treatment, 2354 whichever occurs later. 2355 (f)âThe provider is subject to supervision and regular 2356 inspection by the governmental contractor. 2357 (g)âAs an agent of the governmental contractor for purposes 2358 of s. 768.28(9), while acting within the scope of duties under 2359 the contract, a health care provider licensed under chapter 466 2360 may allow a patient, or a parent or guardian of the patient, to 2361 voluntarily contribute a monetary amount to cover costs of 2362 dental laboratory work related to the services provided to the 2363 patient. This contribution may not exceed the actual cost of the 2364 dental laboratory charges. 2365 2366 A governmental contractor that is also a health care provider is 2367 not required to enter into a contract under this section with 2368 respect to the health care services delivered by its employees. 2369 Section 51.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2370 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 2371 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 766.112, Florida 2372 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2373 766.112âComparative fault.â 2374 (2)âIn an action for damages for personal injury or 2375 wrongful death arising out of medical negligence, whether in 2376 contract or tort, when an apportionment of damages pursuant to 2377 s. 768.81 is attributed to a board of trustees of a state 2378 university, the court shall enter judgment against the board of 2379 trustees on the basis of the boardâs percentage of fault and not 2380 on the basis of the doctrine of joint and several liability. The 2381 sole remedy available to a claimant to collect a judgment or 2382 settlement against a board of trustees, subject to the 2383 provisions of this subsection, shall be pursuant to s. 768.28. 2384 Section 52.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2385 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 2386 reference thereto, subsection (3) of section 768.1355, Florida 2387 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2388 768.1355âFlorida Volunteer Protection Act.â 2389 (3)âMembers of elected or appointed boards, councils, and 2390 commissions of the state, counties, municipalities, authorities, 2391 and special districts shall incur no civil liability and shall 2392 have immunity from suit as provided in s. 768.28 for acts or 2393 omissions by members relating to membersâ conduct of their 2394 official duties. It is the intent of the Legislature to 2395 encourage our best and brightest people to serve on elected and 2396 appointed boards, councils, and commissions. 2397 Section 53.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2398 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 2399 reference thereto, subsection (7) of section 768.1382, Florida 2400 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2401 768.1382âStreetlights, security lights, and other similar 2402 illumination; limitation on liability.â 2403 (7)âIn the event that there is any conflict between this 2404 section and s. 768.81, or any other section of the Florida 2405 Statutes, this section shall control. Further, nothing in this 2406 section shall impact or waive any provision of s. 768.28. 2407 Section 54.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2408 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 2409 reference thereto, subsection (4) of section 768.295, Florida 2410 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2411 768.295âStrategic Lawsuits Against Public Participation 2412 (SLAPP) prohibited.â 2413 (4)âA person or entity sued by a governmental entity or 2414 another person in violation of this section has a right to an 2415 expeditious resolution of a claim that the suit is in violation 2416 of this section. A person or entity may move the court for an 2417 order dismissing the action or granting final judgment in favor 2418 of that person or entity. The person or entity may file a motion 2419 for summary judgment, together with supplemental affidavits, 2420 seeking a determination that the claimantâs or governmental 2421 entityâs lawsuit has been brought in violation of this section. 2422 The claimant or governmental entity shall thereafter file a 2423 response and any supplemental affidavits. As soon as 2424 practicable, the court shall set a hearing on the motion, which 2425 shall be held at the earliest possible time after the filing of 2426 the claimantâs or governmental entityâs response. The court may 2427 award, subject to the limitations in s. 768.28, the party sued 2428 by a governmental entity actual damages arising from a 2429 governmental entityâs violation of this section. The court shall 2430 award the prevailing party reasonable attorney fees and costs 2431 incurred in connection with a claim that an action was filed in 2432 violation of this section. 2433 Section 55.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2434 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 2435 reference thereto, section 946.5026, Florida Statutes, is 2436 reenacted to read: 2437 946.5026âSovereign immunity in tort actions.âThe provisions 2438 of s. 768.28 shall be applicable to the corporation established 2439 under this part, which is deemed to be a corporation primarily 2440 acting as an instrumentality of the state. 2441 Section 56.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2442 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 2443 reference thereto, subsection (3) of section 946.514, Florida 2444 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2445 946.514âCivil rights of inmates; inmates not state 2446 employees; liability of corporation for inmate injuries.â 2447 (3)âThe corporation is liable for inmate injury to the 2448 extent specified in s. 768.28; however, the members of the board 2449 of directors are not individually liable to any inmate for any 2450 injury sustained in any correctional work program operated by 2451 the corporation. 2452 Section 57.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2453 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 2454 reference thereto, subsection (8) of section 961.06, Florida 2455 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2456 961.06âCompensation for wrongful incarceration.â 2457 (8)âAny payment made under this act does not constitute a 2458 waiver of any defense of sovereign immunity or an increase in 2459 the limits of liability on behalf of the state or any person 2460 subject to s. 768.28 or any other law. 2461 Section 58.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2462 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 2463 reference thereto, subsection (3) of section 984.09, Florida 2464 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2465 984.09âPunishment for contempt of court; alternative 2466 sanctions.â 2467 (3)âALTERNATIVE SANCTIONS.âUpon determining that a child 2468 has committed direct contempt of court or indirect contempt of a 2469 valid court order, the court may immediately request the circuit 2470 alternative sanctions coordinator to recommend the most 2471 appropriate available alternative sanction and shall order the 2472 child to perform up to 50 hours of community service or a 2473 similar alternative sanction, unless an alternative sanction is 2474 unavailable or inappropriate, or unless the child has failed to 2475 comply with a prior alternative sanction. Alternative contempt 2476 sanctions may be provided by local industry or by any nonprofit 2477 organization or any public or private business or service entity 2478 that has entered into a contract with the department to act as 2479 an agent of the state to provide voluntary supervision of 2480 children on behalf of the state in exchange for the labor of 2481 children and limited immunity in accordance with s. 768.28(11). 2482 Section 59.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2483 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 2484 reference thereto, paragraph (h) of subsection (12) of section 2485 1002.33, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2486 1002.33âCharter schools.â 2487 (12)âEMPLOYEES OF CHARTER SCHOOLS.â 2488 (h)âFor the purposes of tort liability, the charter school, 2489 including its governing body and employees, shall be governed by 2490 s. 768.28. This paragraph does not include any for-profit entity 2491 contracted by the charter school or its governing body. 2492 Section 60.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2493 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 2494 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (6) of section 2495 1002.333, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2496 1002.333âPersistently low-performing schools.â 2497 (6)âSTATUTORY AUTHORITY.â 2498 (b)âFor the purposes of tort liability, the hope operator, 2499 the school of hope, and its employees or agents shall be 2500 governed by s. 768.28. The sponsor shall not be liable for civil 2501 damages under state law for the employment actions or personal 2502 injury, property damage, or death resulting from an act or 2503 omission of a hope operator, the school of hope, or its 2504 employees or agents. This paragraph does not include any for 2505 profit entity contracted by the charter school or its governing 2506 body. 2507 Section 61.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2508 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 2509 reference thereto, subsection (17) of section 1002.34, Florida 2510 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2511 1002.34âCharter technical career centers.â 2512 (17)âIMMUNITY.âFor the purposes of tort liability, the 2513 governing body and employees of a center are governed by s. 2514 768.28. 2515 Section 62.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2516 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 2517 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 1002.37, Florida 2518 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2519 1002.37âThe Florida Virtual School.â 2520 (2)âThe Florida Virtual School shall be governed by a board 2521 of trustees comprised of seven members appointed by the Governor 2522 to 4-year staggered terms. The board of trustees shall be a 2523 public agency entitled to sovereign immunity pursuant to s. 2524 768.28, and board members shall be public officers who shall 2525 bear fiduciary responsibility for the Florida Virtual School. 2526 The board of trustees shall have the following powers and 2527 duties: 2528 (a)1.âThe board of trustees shall meet at least 4 times 2529 each year, upon the call of the chair, or at the request of a 2530 majority of the membership. 2531 2.âThe fiscal year for the Florida Virtual School shall be 2532 the state fiscal year as provided in s. 216.011(1)(q). 2533 (b)âThe board of trustees shall be responsible for the 2534 Florida Virtual Schoolâs development of a state-of-the-art 2535 technology-based education delivery system that is cost 2536 effective, educationally sound, marketable, and capable of 2537 sustaining a self-sufficient delivery system through the Florida 2538 Education Finance Program. 2539 (c)âThe board of trustees shall aggressively seek avenues 2540 to generate revenue to support its future endeavors, and shall 2541 enter into agreements with distance learning providers. The 2542 board of trustees may acquire, enjoy, use, and dispose of 2543 patents, copyrights, and trademarks and any licenses and other 2544 rights or interests thereunder or therein. Ownership of all such 2545 patents, copyrights, trademarks, licenses, and rights or 2546 interests thereunder or therein shall vest in the state, with 2547 the board of trustees having full right of use and full right to 2548 retain the revenues derived therefrom. Any funds realized from 2549 patents, copyrights, trademarks, or licenses shall be considered 2550 internal funds as provided in s. 1011.07. Such funds shall be 2551 used to support the schoolâs marketing and research and 2552 development activities in order to improve courseware and 2553 services to its students. 2554 (d)âThe board of trustees shall be responsible for the 2555 administration and control of all local school funds derived 2556 from all activities or sources and shall prescribe the 2557 principles and procedures to be followed in administering these 2558 funds. 2559 (e)âThe Florida Virtual School may accrue supplemental 2560 revenue from supplemental support organizations, which include, 2561 but are not limited to, alumni associations, foundations, 2562 parent-teacher associations, and booster associations. The 2563 governing body of each supplemental support organization shall 2564 recommend the expenditure of moneys collected by the 2565 organization for the benefit of the school. Such expenditures 2566 shall be contingent upon the review of the executive director. 2567 The executive director may override any proposed expenditure of 2568 the organization that would violate Florida law or breach sound 2569 educational management. 2570 (f)âIn accordance with law and rules of the State Board of 2571 Education, the board of trustees shall administer and maintain 2572 personnel programs for all employees of the board of trustees 2573 and the Florida Virtual School. The board of trustees may adopt 2574 rules, policies, and procedures related to the appointment, 2575 employment, and removal of personnel. 2576 1.âThe board of trustees shall determine the compensation, 2577 including salaries and fringe benefits, and other conditions of 2578 employment for such personnel. 2579 2.âThe board of trustees may establish and maintain a 2580 personnel loan or exchange program by which persons employed by 2581 the board of trustees for the Florida Virtual School as academic 2582 administrative and instructional staff may be loaned to, or 2583 exchanged with persons employed in like capacities by, public 2584 agencies either within or without this state, or by private 2585 industry. With respect to public agency employees, the program 2586 authorized by this subparagraph shall be consistent with the 2587 requirements of part II of chapter 112. The salary and benefits 2588 of board of trustees personnel participating in the loan or 2589 exchange program shall be continued during the period of time 2590 they participate in a loan or exchange program, and such 2591 personnel shall be deemed to have no break in creditable or 2592 continuous service or employment during such time. The salary 2593 and benefits of persons participating in the personnel loan or 2594 exchange program who are employed by public agencies or private 2595 industry shall be paid by the originating employers of those 2596 participants, and such personnel shall be deemed to have no 2597 break in creditable or continuous service or employment during 2598 such time. 2599 3.âThe employment of all Florida Virtual School academic 2600 administrative and instructional personnel shall be subject to 2601 rejection for cause by the board of trustees, and shall be 2602 subject to policies of the board of trustees relative to 2603 certification, tenure, leaves of absence, sabbaticals, 2604 remuneration, and such other conditions of employment as the 2605 board of trustees deems necessary and proper, not inconsistent 2606 with law. 2607 4.âEach person employed by the board of trustees in an 2608 academic administrative or instructional capacity with the 2609 Florida Virtual School shall be entitled to a contract as 2610 provided by rules of the board of trustees. 2611 5.âAll employees except temporary, seasonal, and student 2612 employees may be state employees for the purpose of being 2613 eligible to participate in the Florida Retirement System and 2614 receive benefits. The classification and pay plan, including 2615 terminal leave and other benefits, and any amendments thereto, 2616 shall be subject to review and approval by the Department of 2617 Management Services and the Executive Office of the Governor 2618 prior to adoption. 2619 (g)âThe board of trustees shall establish priorities for 2620 admission of students in accordance with paragraph (1)(b). 2621 (h)âThe board of trustees shall establish and distribute to 2622 all school districts and high schools in the state procedures 2623 for enrollment of students in courses offered by the Florida 2624 Virtual School. 2625 (i)âThe board of trustees shall establish criteria defining 2626 the elements of an approved franchise. The board of trustees may 2627 enter into franchise agreements with Florida district school 2628 boards and may establish the terms and conditions governing such 2629 agreements. The board of trustees shall establish the 2630 performance and accountability measures and report the 2631 performance of each school district franchise to the 2632 Commissioner of Education. 2633 (j)âThe board of trustees shall submit to the State Board 2634 of Education both forecasted and actual enrollments and credit 2635 completions for the Florida Virtual School, according to 2636 procedures established by the State Board of Education. At a 2637 minimum, such procedures must include the number of public, 2638 private, and home education students served by program and by 2639 county of residence. 2640 (k)âThe board of trustees shall provide for the content and 2641 custody of student and employee personnel records. Student 2642 records shall be subject to the provisions of s. 1002.22. 2643 Employee records shall be subject to the provisions of s. 2644 1012.31. 2645 (l)âThe financial records and accounts of the Florida 2646 Virtual School shall be maintained under the direction of the 2647 board of trustees and under rules adopted by the State Board of 2648 Education for the uniform system of financial records and 2649 accounts for the schools of the state. 2650 2651 The Governor shall designate the initial chair of the board of 2652 trustees to serve a term of 4 years. Members of the board of 2653 trustees shall serve without compensation, but may be reimbursed 2654 for per diem and travel expenses pursuant to s. 112.061. The 2655 board of trustees shall be a body corporate with all the powers 2656 of a body corporate and such authority as is needed for the 2657 proper operation and improvement of the Florida Virtual School. 2658 The board of trustees is specifically authorized to adopt rules, 2659 policies, and procedures, consistent with law and rules of the 2660 State Board of Education related to governance, personnel, 2661 budget and finance, administration, programs, curriculum and 2662 instruction, travel and purchasing, technology, students, 2663 contracts and grants, and property as necessary for optimal, 2664 efficient operation of the Florida Virtual School. Tangible 2665 personal property owned by the board of trustees shall be 2666 subject to the provisions of chapter 273. 2667 Section 63.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2668 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 2669 reference thereto, paragraph (l) of subsection (3) of section 2670 1002.55, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2671 1002.55âSchool-year prekindergarten program delivered by 2672 private prekindergarten providers.â 2673 (3)âTo be eligible to deliver the prekindergarten program, 2674 a private prekindergarten provider must meet each of the 2675 following requirements: 2676 (l)âNotwithstanding paragraph (j), for a private 2677 prekindergarten provider that is a state agency or a subdivision 2678 thereof, as defined in s. 768.28(2), the provider must agree to 2679 notify the coalition of any additional liability coverage 2680 maintained by the provider in addition to that otherwise 2681 established under s. 768.28. The provider shall indemnify the 2682 coalition to the extent permitted by s. 768.28. Notwithstanding 2683 paragraph (j), for a child development program that is 2684 accredited by a national accrediting body and operates on a 2685 military installation that is certified by the United States 2686 Department of Defense, the provider may demonstrate liability 2687 coverage by affirming that it is subject to the Federal Tort 2688 Claims Act, 28 U.S.C. ss. 2671 et seq. 2689 Section 64.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2690 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 2691 reference thereto, subsection (10) of section 1002.83, Florida 2692 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2693 1002.83âEarly learning coalitions.â 2694 (10)âFor purposes of tort liability, each member or 2695 employee of an early learning coalition shall be governed by s. 2696 768.28. 2697 Section 65.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2698 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 2699 reference thereto, paragraph (p) of subsection (1) of section 2700 1002.88, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2701 1002.88âSchool readiness program provider standards; 2702 eligibility to deliver the school readiness program.â 2703 (1)âTo be eligible to deliver the school readiness program, 2704 a school readiness program provider must: 2705 (p)âNotwithstanding paragraph (m), for a provider that is a 2706 state agency or a subdivision thereof, as defined in s. 2707 768.28(2), agree to notify the coalition of any additional 2708 liability coverage maintained by the provider in addition to 2709 that otherwise established under s. 768.28. The provider shall 2710 indemnify the coalition to the extent permitted by s. 768.28. 2711 Notwithstanding paragraph (m), for a child development program 2712 that is accredited by a national accrediting body and operates 2713 on a military installation that is certified by the United 2714 States Department of Defense, the provider may demonstrate 2715 liability coverage by affirming that it is subject to the 2716 Federal Tort Claims Act, 28 U.S.C. ss. 2671 et seq. 2717 Section 66.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2718 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 2719 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 1006.24, Florida 2720 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2721 1006.24âTort liability; liability insurance.â 2722 (1)âEach district school board shall be liable for tort 2723 claims arising out of any incident or occurrence involving a 2724 school bus or other motor vehicle owned, maintained, operated, 2725 or used by the district school board to transport persons, to 2726 the same extent and in the same manner as the state or any of 2727 its agencies or subdivisions is liable for tort claims under s. 2728 768.28, except that the total liability to persons being 2729 transported for all claims or judgments of such persons arising 2730 out of the same incident or occurrence shall not exceed an 2731 amount equal to $5,000 multiplied by the rated seating capacity 2732 of the school bus or other vehicle, as determined by rules of 2733 the State Board of Education, or $100,000, whichever is greater. 2734 The provisions of s. 768.28 apply to all claims or actions 2735 brought against district school boards, as authorized in this 2736 subsection. 2737 Section 67.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2738 made by this act to section 768.28, Florida Statutes, in a 2739 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 2740 1006.261, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2741 1006.261âUse of school buses for public purposes.â 2742 (2) 2743 (b)âFor purposes of liability for negligence, state 2744 agencies or subdivisions as defined in s. 768.28(2) shall be 2745 covered by s. 768.28. Every other corporation or organization 2746 shall provide liability insurance coverage in the minimum 2747 amounts of $100,000 on any claim or judgment and $200,000 on all 2748 claims and judgments arising from the same incident or 2749 occurrence. 2750 Section 68.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.